








































The first
AI-controlled platform
for influencer marketing

ADD YOUR PASSION

W H I T E P A P E R
version 2.0

2017



TABLE OF CONTENT

Disclaimer ......................................................................................................... 5

Abstract ............................................................................................................. 6

1. Market overview ......................................................................................... 7

2. About the project ..................................................................................... 12

Project overview ................................................................................... 12

Problems and solutions ...................................................................... 14

AdHive advantages .............................................................................. 18

3. Team & Advisors ....................................................................................... 19

4. How it works ............................................................................................. 24

Ecosystem ............................................................................................. 24

Advertisers ............................................................................................. 25

Influencers .............................................................................................. 28

Community............................................................................................. 31

Platform .................................................................................................. 34

5. Technology ................................................................................................ 36



6. AdHive Token and financial model ...................................................... 39

Advantages of Blockchain technology implementation ............. 40

Incentives to use ADH Token ............................................................ 40

Benefits for Token holders ................................................................. 41

7. Accounts, Money and Token transfer ................................................. 42

8. Token Sale ................................................................................................. 44

9. Business model and execution plan ................................................... 47

Business model .................................................................................... 47

Project development ........................................................................... 47

Traction ................................................................................................... 47

Engineering ............................................................................................ 49

Business development ........................................................................ 49

Marketing and PR ................................................................................ 50

Community development ................................................................... 50

Roll-out plan .......................................................................................... 50

Budget .................................................................................................... 52

Revenue forecast ................................................................................. 53

Project roadmap ................................................................................... 53

Risks ........................................................................................................ 55



10. Competitors ............................................................................................ 56

11. List of references ................................................................................... 61

12. APPENDIX #1. Technological solutions ........................................... 61

1) Scorch.ai solutions .......................................................................... 61

2) WebVane Framework ...................................................................... 65

13. APPENDIX #2. Math models and Token mechanics...................66



DISCLAIMER
THIS DOCUMENT DOES NOT GIVE PERSONAL, LEGAL, OR FINANCIAL ADVICE. YOU ARE 
STRONGLY ENCOURAGED TO SEEK YOUR OWN PROFESSIONAL, LEGAL, AND FINANCIAL 
ADVICE.

1. The purpose of this White Paper is to present AdHive and ADH Token to potential Token holders in con-
nection with the proposed Token sale.

2. The information set forth below may not be exhaustive and does not imply any elements of a contractual
relationship. Its sole purpose is to provide relevant and reasonable information to potential Token hold-
ers in order for them to determine whether to undertake a thorough analysis of the company with the
intent of purchasing ADH Tokens.

3. Nothing in this White Paper shall be deemed to constitute a prospectus of any sort or a solicitation
for investment, nor does it in any way pertain to an offer or a solicitation of an offer to buy any securities
in any jurisdiction.

4. This document is not composed in accordance with, and is not subject to, laws or regulations of any ju-
risdiction, which are designed to protect investors

5. ADH Token is a utility Token. This product is not a digital currency, security, commodity, or any other
kind of financial instrument and has not been registered under the Securities Act, the securities laws
of any state of the United States, or the securities laws of any other country, including the securities laws
of any jurisdiction in which a potential Token holder is a resident.

6. ADH Token is not intended for sale or use in any jurisdiction where sale or use of digital Tokens may
be prohibited.

7. ADH Token confers no other rights in any form, including but not limited to any ownership, distribution
(including but not limited to profit), redemption, liquidation, proprietary (including all forms of intellectual
property), or other financial or legal rights, other than those specifically described in the White Paper.

8. All statements contained in this Whitepaper, statements made in press releases or in any place acces-
sible by the public and oral statements that may be made by AdHive Platform OÜ or their respective di-
rectors, executive officers, employees or team’s representatives acting on behalf of AdHive Platform OÜ
(as the case may be), that are not statements of historical fact, constitute “forward- looking statements”.
Some of these statements can be identified by forward-looking terms such as “aim”, “target”, “antic-
ipate”, “believe”, “could”, “estimate”, “expect”, “if”, “intend”, “may”, “plan”, “possible”, “probable”,
“project”, “should”, “would”, “will” or other similar terms. However, these terms are not the exclusive
means of identifying forward-looking statements. All statements regarding AdHive Platform OÜ’s finan-
cial position, business strategies, plans and prospects and the future prospects of the industry which
AdHive Platform OÜ is in are forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements, including
but not limited to statements as to AdHive Platform OÜ’s revenue and profitability, prospects, future
plans, other expected industry trends and other matters discussed in this Whitepaper regarding AdHive
Platform OÜ are matters that are not historic facts, but only predictions.

9. White Paper can be modified to provide more detailed information. This English language White Paper
is the primary official source of information about the ADH Token.

10. The information contained herein may from time to time be translated into other languages or used
in the course of written or verbal communications with existing and prospective customers, partners etc.
In the event of any conflicts or inconsistencies between such translations and communications and this
official English language White Paper, the provisions of this English language original document shall
prevail.

5



11. The White Paper may be updated or altered, with the latest version of the Document prevailing over
previous versions. AdHive is not obliged to give notice of and changes. The latest version of the White
Paper in English is available at the website https://adhive.tv/. While we make every effort to ensure that
all data submitted in the White Paper is accurate and up to date at the point in time that the relevant
version has been disseminated, the proposed document is no alternative to consulting an independent
3rd party opinion.

ABSTRACT

AdHive will be the first AI-controlled Influencer Marketing platform with Blockchain technological solutions. 
The AdHive platform fully automates all steps of interaction with influencers in order to save a huge amount of time 
and effort for advertisers. The platform will offer brands the opportunity to place a native video ad on an unlimited 
number of influencer channels without having to worry about proper execution. Native video advertising will become 
easy to run, and new opportunities for blog monetization will power community development and increase audience 
and advertising capacity. 

The core mission of Adhive.tv is to create a new world of advertising by increasing reach for brands and providing 
a way to monetise blogs while creating better content for viewers. Our main goal is to remove the boundaries be-
tween brands and influencers, taking control of the fastest growing segment of advertising.

Announcement of task to related influencers;2

Automated control of appropriate placement 
by AI module;

3

Confirmation of automated transfer of 
ADH Tokens to influencer;

4

Video quality assessment and forecast 
of efficiency;

5

Get a reward  for video assessment;6

Completion of campaign, reporting.7

Advertisement task with details of target 
audience, deposit of funds;

1

 

 

advertiser

platform

7 2

4

3 5

6

community members

AI

video and speech
recognition

module

influencers

1

Settlement and quality control systems built on Ethereum blockchain and smart contracts ensure transparent 
and genuine results. AI modules for video and speech recognition connect to video channels and control the execu-
tion of ad tasks by the influencer. Blockchain technology provides a real-time, cost-effective and secure settlement 
model for advertisers, influencers and community members. The AdHive platform automates all placement, control 
and payments — usually a common nuisance for advertisers. The platform can be easily integrated with other plat-
forms and services for native video ad placement like Ninja Outreach, BlogMint, BrandBacker and others to deliver 
additional value for advertisers. 

The team of AdHive consists of diverse professionals from AI and software development, financial management, 
international digital marketing, sales, and business development areas.

6

https://adhive.tv/
https://adhive.tv/


GLOBAL ADVERTISING MARKET

The global advertising industry is evolving quickly due to increased use of digital media and a shift in advertising 
formats. According to eMarketer’s latest forecast[1], the global advertising market is set to reach $584bn this year 
and is expected to increase 29.7% to $757.7bln in 2021.

The US, China, Japan, the UK, and Germany are still representing the major share of global ad spending. The Unit-
ed States continues to be the largest advertising market with a total spend of $205.06 billion in 2017. The Chinese 
market is expected to grow by 11.5% this year, its ad spend surpassing that of the UK, Germany and Japan com-
bined. Moreover, global advertising markets will accelerate in 2018; in particular, Russia will be one of the drivers 
with a growth rate of 10%, due to the preparation and holding of the FIFA World Cup[2].

MARKET OVERVIEW1

Total Media AD Spending Worldwide 
2016–2021

Digital AD Spending Worldwide 
2016–2021

544,41 191,87

7.0 7.3 7.9
8.3

5.8 4.8

bn bn% % %

2016 20162017 20172018 20182019 20192020 20202021 2021

584,00 228,44

630,43 266,04

682,83 306,59

722,64 341,81

757,66 $ 375,80 $

Total Media AD Spending Digital AD SpendingChange Change

% %

%

35.2

20.1

39.1

19.1

42.2

16.5

44.9

15.2

47.3

11.5

49.6

9.9

+11.5%
Asia-Pacific i s e xperiencing t he f astest a d spend 
growth with China rising at 11,5% this year.

+10%
The Russian advertising market is expected to 
accelerate in 2018, due to the Football World Cup.

+6.1%
The US advertising market will continue to grow 
at a steady pace in 2017.

7



Growth in ad spending is primarily driven by the continued rise of Digital media, which is on track to sustain its dou-
ble-digit growth annually through to 2020.

Digital advertising reached two symbolic milestones in 2017:
1) Digital ad spending surpassed TV ad spending in 2017, and became the number 1 category globally;
2) Digital ad spending passed the $200bn mark to reach $228.4 billion this year[2].

By the end of 2017 digital ad market will have grown 19.1% and contributed a $36.6 billion increase in advertising 
spending, representing more than 90% of total incremental media spend offset by declines in Print[3].

Incremental spending by media in 2017

-25% -5% 15% 35% 55% 75% 95% 115%

Digital

TV

Cinema / Media 

Print/Other

90,90%

22,40%

7,30%

-20,60%

Digital AD Market share

2015 2016 2017 2018

TV

Other

Digital

38% 37% 36% 35%

33% 35% 40% 41%

29% 28% 24% 24%

DIGITAL VIDEO ADVERTISING

With mobile media consumption rising rapidly, easily adaptable ads such as video, social media, and search adver-
tising, are also quickly transitioning to mobile. According to Magna, video advertising and social media are the key 
drivers of digital advertising growth in 2017, expanding by +30% and +32% respectively[4].

Online video is quickly becoming one of the key means for people to meet their information and entertainment 
needs. The number of digital video viewers grew by 8.2% and reached 2.15 billion globally this year. This is equal 
to 62% of all internet users[5].

8



TOTAL

% Change in Digital/Mo-
bile Video Dollar Spend 
2015–2017

*

2015 2016 2017

A recent IAB research showed that average annual spend on 
Digital Video surpassed $9 million in 2017 — an increase of 67% 
over the last 2 years[6].

Advertisers are now allocating 56% of digital advertising 
budgets to digital video.  

Further, 61% of advertisers plan to increase their spending 
in the next 12 months. 

According to HubSpot review[7], 51.9% of marketers worldwide 
consider video to be the content category with the best ROI.

Aberdeen Group reports that the revenue of companies using 
video advertising is growing 49% faster than those of non-video 
using companies[8].

$5,6

$6,8

$9,4

+67%
Increase 2015–2017*

Another significant advertising market trend over the past two years has been the rapid rise of social video. Social 
video advertising already represents 25% of digital video advertising and its share is increasing rapidly[4]. The top 
social networking sites — Facebook, Instagram and Snapchat – along with YouTube, the biggest digital video 
platform, are currently driving the shift to digital video.

NATIVE ADVERTISING MARKET

Advertising is an increasingly volatile industry — new trends rise thick and fast. Native advertising has rapidly 
become a new reality for the advertising market for the reasons outlined below, which are by no means exhaustive.

TV audience is getting older: 
- 33% — People under 24

years old watch television
33% less than in 2010;

Print and radio advertising sales 
will decrease:
- 9% CAGR (16-21) for print

media market. Print and radio
will continue to face stiff com-
petition from digital media
market[4].

Only 8% of internet users can 
recall the last promoted brand 
they saw;

0,17% — average CTR in 2016 
(opposed to 1,5% in 2005);

1903 ads per months — the av-
erage user sees;

50% users never click on online 
ads[10].

$27bn by 2020 — estimated rev-
enue loss due to Adblocking;

70% of consumers would have 
a poorer opinion of a brand if in-
terruptive ad formats are sub-
jected;

11% of internet users blocking 
ads around the globe;

30% global growth year-to-year 
in Adblock usage[9].

Traditional Marketing is be-
coming obsolete

The Emergence of Banner 
Blindness

Growing Adblock Usage

9



The Native Advertising Institute (NAI) defines Native Advertising as paid advertising, where the ad matches the form, 
feel and function of the content of the media on which it appears[11]. Native Ads are attracting greater attention, are 
more consumer engaging, more trusted and non-intrusive.

A recent NAI survey shows that 91% of advertisers say that native advertising important or very important 
for their company. Moreover, only 3% of advertisers are not using or do not plan to use native ads in their campaigns 
[14].

When it comes to video, 63% of advertisers now consider this format to be one of the biggest native advertising 
opportunities for their company. According to IAB report, 42% of Original Digital Video Advertising budget goes to 
Native Ads.

All of this makes native video advertising, especially native video ads through social media, one of the best adver-
tising opportunities for the future.

Native Ad Spending

2016 2020

Native advertising has skyrocketed over the past few years, 
accounting for $40.2 billion in 2016 and is expected to climb 
to $85.5 billion by 2020, according to AdYouLike. This equates 
to +113% growth within four years[12].

According to a recent Facebook Audience Network report, con-
sumers interact with native ads up to 60% more often than stan-
dard banner ads.

Moreover, native ad brings 2 times greater eCPM 
and 3 times CRR [13].

$40,2

$85,5

Global Native Advertising Market
$ billions and % change

INFLUENCER MARKETING

Social media has become a crucial tool for digital communications. According to IZEA, 7 in 10 US internet users 
aged 18–70 use social media each month[16]. Such changes in information consumption habits have promptly led 
to a change in consumer behaviour. According to AdWeek, 74% of internet users now use social networks prior 
to making purchase decisions, and 49% of users rely on purchase recommendations from influencers.

With social media representing an increasingly integral part of consumers’ lives, influencer marketing has become 
one of the biggest trends in the industry. Influencer marketing has a number of benefits for advertisers:

• Greater audience engagement;
• Speak your customer’s language;
• Cost-effective;
• AdBlock resistant content format;
• Fast and simple way to create unique video content.

10



It is no wonder the influencer advertising market skyrocketed in 2016. A recent Linqia report says that 86% of 
marketing professionals are already using influencer marketing tools and 94% of them found this advertising 
channel to be effective [15]. 

Furthermore, 48% of marketers increased their influencer marketing budgets in 2017 and 37% of respondents 
are currently spending $50K-$100K per influencer marketing program. 

According to Nielsen Catalina Solutions, influencer marketing content delivers 11x higher ROI than traditional forms 
of digital marketing[17].

Social media platforms that offer quick visual content have the strongest consumer engagement, therefore, You-
Tube, Facebook, Instagram and Snapchat are the most preferred social media platforms for influencer advertising.
There are over 15 million businesses now on Instagram, and 80% of Instagram users follow at least one business 
account.

YouTube has become a major platform for digital video advertising and a valuable tool for influencers: over four 
thousand YouTube channels have 1M+ subscribers. YouTube’s audience is huge and is about to get even bigger: 
1.5 billion logged-in viewers visit YouTube every single month — one of every five people around the world! Users 
spend over an hour a day watching YouTube. YouTube stars are 17x “more engaging” and 11x “more extraordi-
nary” than “traditional” celebrities among teenagers.

A huge number of internet users are creating their own social media profiles on a daily basis, and with an ever-in-
creasing audience influencer marketing prospects are growing rapidly.

1 Original digital video is professionally produced video for digital/online consumption.

GAME STREAMING

Another segment of native video advertising with great potential for growth is game streaming and video broadcast-
ing: Twitch, Dailymotion, YouTube, USTREAM, etc.

The global audience of video game content is 500 million people, more than 30% of which receive information from 
stream-content. According to market researcher Newzoo, In 2017 the E-sports Economy will grow to $696 million, 
with a year-by-year growth of 41.3%. Brands are expected to spend $517 million, including $155 million on advertis-
ing, with overall investment nearly tripling by 2020 to $1.5 billion. The global e-sports audience will reach 385 million 
in 2017 and is expected to grow another 50% by 2020. With the development of real-time engines for ad placement 
and control recognition on live channels, the AdHive platform could be easily integrated with streaming platforms 
to deliver additional value for advertisers and for the whole AdHive ecosystem.

LONG-TERM MARKET TREND

Advertisers and publishers are gradually adopting programmatic ad-buying and selling tools. Currently, program-
matic advertising is mainly presented by desktop banner ads. But, by 2020, video and mobile will represent 
a majority of the programmatic ecosystem.

11



The long-term goal of AdHive is to make a programmatic native advertising platform built on influencer marketing 
channels.

• Greater campaign control and targeting;
• Greater campaign flexibility;
• Lower media unit costs;
• Better campaign reporting;
• Faster campaign set up and launch;

• Highly automated advertising.

ABOUT THE PROJECT2

PROJECT OVERVIEW

Adhive.tv – AI and community powered platform for native video advertising on influencer’s channels.

There are millions of influencers in the world, but brands only work with a limited number, due to a lack of transpar-
ency and reliability, inaccurate metrics and the overall complexity of the given market. Despite the outdated and 
inefficient ad format, TV still represents a large part of the advertising market.

The AdHive team has decided to launch a platform which will create a distributed network of influencers with clear 
rules and quality, with automated operations and payments. AdHive will enable the transformation of ad placement 
on influencer channels from a PR area into a pure media product, a standardized media inventory, open for purchase 
by media agencies by CPM or display media procurement.

Programmatic advertising — algorithm-driven targeting of ad units to specific audiences.

Main advantages:

NATIVE ADVERTISING 

Native ad — advertising in which the ad matches the form, feel, and function of the content of the media 
in which it appears.

Native ads are organically integrated into the content of a particular source of information, and are 
not overly noticeable or distracting.

12

http://Adhive.tv


AI modules and blockchain technology make this platform a place, where influencers assemble to form one giant 
virtual TV channel with powerful targeting mechanics and high audience engagement, the likes of which is unachiev-
able in the TV advertising market.

AdHive will assemble advertisers and influencers on the platform, working with thousands of small influencers 
as one channel, worldwide.

Agencies working with influencers will also gain access to the AdHive platform for free, monetizing their local net-
works of influencers, and allowing them to share their bloggers with other agencies. This will drive demand for the 
ADH Token.

The main advantage of Adhive.tv over the current system of multiple influencer marketplaces is that there is 
no time wasted on peer-to-peer communication between advertisers and influencers. With AdHive, advertisers do 
not need to choose a particular influencer and control the placement — the platform does it automatically. The plat-
form will choose relevant influencers, propose tasks and conditions, confirm acceptance of terms, ensure proper 
placement, and release payment when the task is complete. All these actions are performed automatically, saving 
time for advertisers.

advertiser influencer

influencer VLOG

VLOG

VLOG

Community
member

influencer

Platform BI

Verification status

Views and Likes — AI forecast

Ad task Verification

Ad quality assessment

• Real-time analytics;
• Detailed reports;
• Press-clipping of com-

pleted Ad campaign;

13

http://Adhive.tv


One of the features of the platform is complex and reliable assessment of native video ad placement efficiency by 
community members, making advertising measurable and understandable with proven results. The Platform can 
analyze the mentioning of words and showing of brands on video channels to find the volume of brand coverage 
and that of competitors.

ON ADHIVE

- No direct communication payments between advertisers and influencers — payments are released
by smart contracts when AI confirms that the work is done properly;

- No need to choose influencers — just choose the target audience and the platform will do the rest;
- No messy chats, endless questions and comments — all tasks are formalized to be confirmed

by Machine Learning modules for video and speech recognition.

PROBLEMS AND SOLUTIONS

Consumers aged 13–24 spend 11.3 hours weekly watching free online video, compared to 8.3 
hours for regularly scheduled TV, according to a study by Defy Media. A major factor driving Inten-        
net-video consumption among millennials were, per the study: 62% of survey respondents said digital 
content makes them “feel good” about themselves vs. 40% reported for TV. According to the survey, 
67% of millennials said digital content delivers content they can relate to vs. 41% for TV, and 66% 
said they turn to digital content to relax vs. 47% for TV. 

Users are less likely to pay attention to banners — very few people are receptive to them, most ac-
tually hate them. Native video advertising, on the other hand, does not stand out against the back-
ground of the video on which it is located. Such advertising corresponds to the type, style and content 
of the video.

The global advertising market has been plagued by multiple problems for years, including banner blindness, aging 
of TV audiences, declining audience involvement in classical advertising, the emergence of advertising blockers, 
etc. To a certain extent, a response to these problems was the explosive growth of markets for native advertising 
and influencer marketing.

Influencer Marketing and Native Advertising markets have been growing at an incredible pace in recent years and 
such growth rates inevitably entail certain institutional disparities. However, an adequate and transparent system of 
interaction between market participants has not yet been formed, and brands and influencers suffer from asymmet-
ric information and the presence of intermediary agencies with unreasonably high commissions. Effective metrics 
and control mechanisms have still not been defined and the structure of the market as a whole remains extremely 
complicated. The AdHive platform effectively solves most problems for both the Native Advertising and Influencer 
Marketing markets and the global advertising market in general.

14



Young people under the age of 25 watch 
almost no TV, therefore they can hard-
ly be reached by display ads. Traditional 
channels of video advertising are limited. 
Millennials are watching video blogs, look-
ing for answers not on Google, but on You-
Tube.

The price of placement on famous influ-
encers’ channels can be comparable to TV 
or even higher, but the price of placement 
on unknown channels is quite afford-
able. However, operationally, it is difficult 
to place similar commercials on more than 
20-30 channels at the same time.

The main difference between tradition-
al ad agencies and AdHive is the ability 
of Adhive.tv to work with a group of small 
influencers, providing more accurate tar-
geting and reaching a broader audience 
with a lower price per contact. Via API, 
each influencer shares statistical data 
about the audience of the channel: num-
ber of video views, likes and comments, 
subscribers, involvement of the audience, 
regions of viewers, duration of the views, 
etc. The advertiser will get an overview 
of the audiences of various influencers 
and can filter for his target audience, getting 
a list of only those influencers who match 
it. However, it is impractical to choose in-
fluencers manually, so the platform is void 
of personal placement.

After the advertiser sets up a campaign, 
each influencer from the selection can re-
spond to the task and perform it, receiving 
payment the same day. During the whole 
process the advertiser and influencer can
not communicate with each other                   
directly — only with the platform. The plat-
form arranges the deal and manages the 
task of buying views from influencers and 
selling prices to advertisers. 

Lack of video contact with target audi-
ence  

1.

PROBLEM SOLUTION

AdHive platform solution

For ADVERTISERS

15



AdHive community members are in-
volved  in giving and getting feedback 
about quality and attractiveness of pub-
lished videos. Community assessment and 
feedback will be shared between the plat-
form and the influencers and will be used 
for further education of influencers and ad-
vertisers. Community members can be any 
person who is interested in the develop-
ment of social video advertising.

AdHive will start from Youtube. Instagram, 
Facebook, and popular local social net-
works will be connected to the platform 
later. All of them have API to get all avail-
able information about channels’ audienc-
es.

Calculation of the amount of payment 
to the influencer is based on quality assess-
ment of community members and a pre-
diction math model. CPM, which is used 
for calculation, can also be changed by the 
platform using internal algorithms to man-
age the margin or expand the coverage 
by trying to attract influencers with a re-
quested audience. The advertiser credits 
his account with Tokens, fiat or crypto cur-
rencies, by sending the amount of the ad-
vertising campaign to the platform account 
as a refundable deposit. The influencer 
is rewarded when the job is completed and 
verified by the AI.

Tools not effective for working with 
influencers 

In its current state, this market is grow-
ing mostly by campaigns where 90+% 
of ad budgets go to top-level influencers, 
and there is very little movement to shift 
the budgets to influencers with medium 
and small audiences.

Dozens of influencer marketplaces will not 
change this picture dramatically because 
of a lack of confidence, rules, metrics and 
tools for control — a mainly manual pro-
cess with low productivity and capacity.

Difficulties of working with influencers

Influencers work on a prepayment system, 
and the price of ad placement for the same 
influencer can vary, depending on many 
factors. The actual budget may differ 
from the planned one, and the number 
of viewers/price for contact could also 
vary. 

When a commercial is posted by an influ-
encer, there is a risk of receiving an un-
successful video for the entire audience 
which cannot  be adjusted or altered by the 
advertiser. It is safer to decrease risk and 
place more commercials with less popular 
influencers as opposed to fewer commer-
cials with big-name influencers, but it is or-
ganizationally unmanageable.

It takes time to agree on details and 
to verify results for each influencer and 
to check whether each requirement of 
the assignment was executed.

2.

3.

16



There is a lack of any information about vid-
eo content on influencer channels — what 
they mention, how and which brands ap-
pear on video, and how often they appear.

For the moment there is no measured 
data about video content which could be 
used for new content creation for native           
video ad campaigns.

The AdHive platform is able to monitor 
each channel to track brands / names / 
objects in video. To prepare effective tar-
geting and the right type of advertising 
messages, advertisers can take into ac-
count current competitor activity, cover-
age and brand awareness, market share 
of each brand, etc. for each audience. 
Video monitoring could be organized as a 
continuous service to keep an eye on com-
petitors and public activity.

Before developing an advertising strate-
gy and plan, advertisers with AdHive can 
analyze previous and current mentioning 
of target brands, categories, products, 
or objects to prepare a plan based on 
measurable parameters. At the moment, 
searching for a mention can only be made 
in text form, similar to Google Brand Lift. 
After the campaign execution, advertisers 
will remain active on AdHive to monitor re-
sults of the campaign and track new video 
content.

Lack of information about video 
content

AdHive video monitoring solution4.

Influencers get a flow of advertisement 
proposals, all of them formalized, and it 
becomes possible to plan the several next 
videos with the understanding of their 
monetization. Influencers save time by 
excluding negotiations from their sched-
ule and have more opportunities to create 
content.

To have an appropriate supply of advertis-
ing offers to monetize blogs, a influencer’s 
base of subscribers must be big enough 
to be interesting for agencies, or the influ-
encer can build a pipeline of offers  on  his 
own. Both ways are not so easy for be-
ginners or early influencers, and it doesn’t 
work very well for influencers who  value 
independence.

5.

For INFLUENCERS

AdHive is focused on the establishment of a global decentralized native video ad network. The AdHive ecosystem 
will be built as a long-term cooperative effort where advertisers have an opportunity to be involved in the dynamic 
market of native video advertising, and participants of the platform will be able to grow their capabilities and gain 
a profit from participating in a variety of advertising and quality assessment tasks.

17



Work with a proven provider, regular or-
ders, and payment guarantees

Receive a reward calculation daily and in 
advance

Transparent mechanism for monetizing a 
channel

Support of video influencers to better mon-
etization of blogs and creation of effective 
native advertisements

Access to a large pool of advertising cam-
paigns

Ability to monetize online streams — con-
trol the placement of advertising in real 
time

Analysis of all connected video channels 
to investigate volume of target mentions, 
words, and showing of brands

Fair and reliable assessment of native vid-
eo ad campaign efficiency based on com-
plex review by the community

Payment for properly placed ads only

Links placed on influencers’ public pages 
on social networks for a multiplied effect

No need to interact with influencers direct-
ly to agree on terms, control the result, pay 
for the result, or collect reports 

Access to a young audience as well as 
subcultures

No production costs, but a lot of user con-
tent could be accumulated

ADHIVE ADVANTAGES

For ADVERTISERS For INFLUENCERS

18



Real time tracking of online broad-
casts — impossible to do manually

Review by community members as a dou-
ble check of AI to make sure the ad is 
properly placed

Run multinational campaigns with video 
ad creation  in local languages and corre-
sponding to local culture

TEAM & ADVISORS3

PROJECT DEVELOPMENT, OPERATIONS, CO-FOUNDER

STRATEGY, HR, TECHNOLOGICAL DEVELOPMENT, CO-FOUNDER

Co-founder of Scorch.ai, Webvane, CEO of data management service, 
10+ years in sales and business development.
Previously: Groupon

Software development team leader and architect (15 years of experience), 
Co-founder of Scorch.ai, Ideologist and developer of Webvane framework.

Dmitry Malyanov

Vadim Budaev

TOKEN MODEL DEVELOPMENT, INVESTMENT AND FINANCIAL 
MANAGEMENT, CO-FOUNDER

Serial entrepreneur and investor with much experience in start-up development. 
Former professional trader.

Alexandr Kuzmin

19

http://scorch.ai/
http://webvane.org/
http://scorch.ai/
http://webvane.org/


PROJECT MANAGER

MARKETING

ASIA COMMUNITY MANAGER

OPERATIONS, MARKETING

Experienced ICO manager. Worked with top global and Russian agencies spe-
cializing in digital marketing and CRM with sophisticated understanding of both 
B2B and B2C markets. 

Qmarketing Founder, Qlean Co-founder.

Broad experience in community-building worldwide.

Expert in executing go to market strategies and building up marketing & sales 
functions, with 10 years of experience. Deep knowledge of ICO projects. Culti-
vates integration of sales and marketing channels, building the structure of mar-
keting units.

Alena Vinokurova

Roman Vias

Joy Yugay

Ivan Kotov

STRATEGY AND BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT: INVESTMENT ACQUISITION, 
GOVERNMENT RELATIONS AND JOINT VENTURES ON FOREIGN MARKETS.

M.S.P.M.

Dmitry Romanov

LEGAL COMPLIANCE AND STRUCTURING

8 years of experience in international tax planning. Kristina’s competence also 
covers the issues of offshore and holding structuring, financial and  gambling 
licensing and legal support in bank account opening worldwide.

Kristina Kurapova

20



Denis Vorobev
SOFTWARE DEVELOPMENT. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE EXPERT

5 years of experience in software development. 3 years of experience in AI 
and new methods for localizing objects in image using convolutional neural 
net-works. Ph.D. candidate.

Denis Dymont
FRONTEND AND FULL STACK DEVELOPER

5 years of experience in software development in Video streaming, AI tools 
for businesses, Dating, Social Community sites.

Dmitry Bogdanov
SERVER SIDE DEVELOPER

6 years of experience in software development in: microservice architecture, 
video streaming, interaction with external services (payment, social and other).

Daria Muhaleva
HEAD OF BLOGGERS COMMUNITY

Five years in advertising, since 2016 in journalism. Six years of experience in 
project management.

Larry Christopher Bates
USA COMMUNITY MANAGER

Neuroimaging scientist, serial crypto project developer and Blockchain Enthusi-ast. 
Telecommunications and cyber-security specialist. 
Former community leader/advisor for Factom and Synereo. 
Chief Security Officer/President for Bitland Global

And this is not all!

The AdHive team consists of about 50 professionals with vast experience 
in business, marketing, software development and other industries!

21



ADVISORY BOARD

Serguei Popov
SCIENTIFIC AND TOKEN PRODUCT CONCEPT ADVISOR
Brazilian research mathematician of Russian origin with a Ph.D. from the 
Moscow State University. Currently works in the field of Stochastic Processes. 
He became interested in crypto in the end of 2013, and made a number of 
contributions to the theoretical aspects of the Nxt cryptocurrency and PoS in 
general. Co-founder of IOTA and WINGS projects.

Ivo Georgiev
AD TECH ADVISOR
Extensive experience as a software engineer with a particular interest in the 
video-on-demand industry. Since 2012, he has been heading Stremio.
Well-versed in cryptography and crypto currencies.
CEO and co-founder of AdEx.

Eyal Hertzog
BLOCKCHAIN AND AD TECH ADVISOR
Venture-backed technology entrepreneur for over 20 years. Founder of 
Meta-Cafe, Israel’s fastest growing video sharing site reaching over 50m 
uniques at its peak. Previously, Eyal founded Contact Networks, one of the 
first social networks. Eyal has been an outspoken thought leader on 
cryptocurrency in Is-rael and is a talented piano and bass musician. 
Co-founder of Bancor.

Soheil Mirpour
BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT ADVISOR

Senior Vice President for Investments at Rocket Internet and a Senior Director at the 
firm’s investment arm Global Founders Capital. He leads the firm’s Private Equity 
and Growth Investing. Previously, he worked in Private Equity at Kohlberg Kravis 
Roberts and in Investment Banking at Morgan Stanley.

Chad Pollitt
NATIVE ADVERTISING ADVISOR

Chad Pollitt s the co-founder of Relevance, the world’s first and only website dedicate 
to content promotion, news and insights. He’s a former partner at the Native 
Advertising Institute, dedicated to advancing native advertising and leading, educating 
and connecting marketing, advertising, and publishing professionals so they can 
flourish in a new, more native, world.
Named one of 8 top influencers to follow in native advertising, Chad authored “The 
Native Advertising Manifesto,” “The Content Promotion Manifesto” and “The Global 
Guide to Native Advertising Technology.” He’s also an Adjunct Professor of Internet 
Marketing at the Indiana University Kelley School of Business and an Adjunct Instructor 
of Content Marketing at the Rutgers University Business School.

22

https://scholar.google.com.br/citations?user=z62rjg0AAAAJ
http://ledger.pitt.edu/ojs/index.php/ledger/article/view/46
http://ledger.pitt.edu/ojs/index.php/ledger/article/view/46


PARTNERS

WINGS — Decentralized platform for crowdfunding projects. Wings plays a 
significant role in tech support for the AdHive  crowd-sale campaign. The 
Wings community brings marketing support for the project.

AdEx is a blockchain-based ad exchange aimed at disrupting the existing 
online advertising landscape and addressing its signifi-cant problems: 
advertising fraud, privacy, and consent to receiving sponsored messages, 
etc.

The partnership between AdEx and AdHive will allow us to func-tion 
more effectively in the advertising market for both projects. In particular, 
some AdEx advertising campaigns related to video will be implemented on 
the AdHive platform using ADH Tokens.

The Bancor protocol enables built-in price discovery and a liquidity 
mechanism for Tokens on smart contract blockchains.

The Bancor protocol eliminates the liquidity risk for ADH Token holders 
by providing exchange mechanisms for ADH Tokens through the 
Token Changer — a combination of an exchange and market-maker based 
on smart contracts. The Token Changer is a smart Token that holds two or 
more digital assets in its reserve and is used to exchange between ADH 
Tokens, BNT Tokens, ETH, etc.

Ariel Israilov
INVESTMENT ADVISOR

Graduate from Finanz Akademie, Vienna with a trading and market making 
background. Over 15 years of global entrepreneurship experience. As a venture 
capitalist his investment focus is East-African, ASEAN and CIS countries. CEO 
and founder of FRESHVALE LTD and several IT, finance and security tech-
nologies companies.

23

https://www.wings.ai/#!/home/discover
https://adex.network/
http://The Bancor


HOW IT WORKS4

ECOSYSTEM

AdHive will be built as an environment where each participant will be motivated to act and develop the platform eco-
system, which will in turn increase rewards for all participants involved. Financial mechanics for each part is based 
on a profit-and-loss approach where influencers must need to guarantee their intentions via a security deposit of 
ADH Tokens, which will be locked in a smart contract until certain conditions are met. Community members risk 
missing out on rewards in case of incorrect assessments of ad quality. Rewards for community members depend 
on the amount of Tokens held in their wallets. This approach will motivate influencers to place ads properly and 
community members to make more accurate assessments and well-informed surveys. It also provides anti-spam 
and Sybil-attack protection.

The key approach of the platform is balance, help, and control of each other. Community members balance the 
interests of influencers and advertisers. The platform shares advertisement budgets among the all Platform partici-
pants to maximize motivation to act and develop the platform ecosystem.

Detailed step-by-step scheme of 
collaboration of Advertisers, Influenc-
ers, Community members and the 
Platform.

PLATFORM OVERVIEW

Create a 
campaign

Choose the
audience

Create a list 
of appropriate 

influencers

Calculate # of 
ADH Tokens 
to transfer

Receive the 
reward + 

security deposit

Completion
is verified 

by AI

Complete the 
task

Assess the 
quality 

of video ad

Publish an 
announcement
for influencers

Apply to task 
and make 
a security 

deposit in ADH 
Tokens

Deposit the 
required 

amount of To-
kens/money

Calculate a 
total price for

campaign

Get the 
campaign 

report

Reach the
target amount

of views

Get a reward
for assessment

AD
VE

RT
IS

ER
PL

AT
FO

R
M

IN
FL

U
EN

C
ER

C
O

M
M

U
N

IT
Y

24



ADVERTISERS
The cabinet for advertisers will be easy-to-use, with the following key functions:

In this section, the Advertiser can set up all the necessary 
parameters for the future campaign (Parameters of audi-
ence, Deadline for publication of the task, Duration of the 
campaign, Deadline for applications, Target regions, Bud-
get) and launch the campaign.

Detailed statistics of advertising campaigns. Reports on 
completed campaigns.

At any time, the advertiser can get help on technical or 
other issues.

Card and crypto wallet details for transfer of ADH Tokens 
to crypto and fiat currencies. Debit card details.

Page for launching and monitoring studies on the influ-
encer channels.Advertisers can build a very comprehen-
sive monitoring list to track video content and activity of 
brands opinions of influencers.

Campaign setup and start 
page

Campaign dashboard

Feedback on the platform

Wallet

Video content analysis page

A. NATIVE VIDEO AD PLACEMENT ON INFLUENCER CHANNELS WITH RELEVANT
AUDIENCE

Create a
campaign

Get the 
campaign 

report

Choose the
audience Place ad task

Create triggers 
and request for AI 
module learning

Deposit the 
required amount 
of money/Tokens

Campaign 
approved 

by moderator 
and placed

Advertiser workflow

The Platform allows to advertise classic brands and companies, as well as to advertise the Token Sale promotions 
and actual crypto projects. Payments for campaign can be done via cryptocurrencies or via project Tokens which 
will be converted to AdHive Tokens.

25



An advertiser can select the target audience by all available parameters (with API), place the advertising task, create 
triggers and request explanations of recognition modules, and credit the deposit by any type of money (fiat or cryp-
to currencies). After the campaign opens, it must be approved by an AdHive moderator. During the campaign real 
time data is collected on the dashboard with the appropriate metrics. During the period of adoption of the AdHive 
platform and AI technology there will be no cost for explanations of AI video and speech recognition modules.

After these are set, the platform will estimate the number of views, comments, likes, reposts, and the advertiser will 
be able to change settings to achieve the target parameters.

An advertiser should not spend more than a couple of minutes preparing a campaign:

1. Parameters of audience — can be filtered by all available parameters of social networks;
2. Deadline for publication of the task;
3. Period of campaign, deadline for applications;
4. Target Regions;
5. Budget.

Start of campaign

Duration of campaign

The period of campaign is determined by the advertiser and not limited by platform. Technically it could be 2-3 days 
or 1 year. By default, the calculation of the cost of campaign for the advertiser is based on total number of video 
views for the first 30 days and CPM for the advertiser. 

26



1. Stop List — a field in the campaign creation form, for influencers that the advertiser does not want to
attract for a task. The Advertiser can put links in the field for channels which should be excluded from
the pool.

2. List of sponsored influencers — advertisers can send promo Tokens to groups of influencers manually
mentioned (links to their channels) or filtered by their rating, to motivate them to take part in the cam-
paign. Such Tokens can only be received for execution of a particular advertising task. If the influencer
does not execute the task, the promo Tokens will be returned to the advertiser.

How to manage a influencer list for a campaign

In general, Adhive.tv is a platform where influencers have an opportunity to become more professional and famous. 
The mechanics of advertising with AdHive are similar to TV ad placement — advertisers initially choose the param-
eters of the audience and not the specific influencers. However, AdHive proposes a few ways for the advertiser to 
have an affect on the influencer pool:

End of campaign

At the end of a campaign the Advertiser will get a report with the number of contacts with the target audience and 
a list of links to video instances of task execution. Each report will contain details about unique and total viewers of 
the video, as well as interactions within the audience of influencers.

B. VIDEO CONTENT ANALYSIS AND MONITORING - PRE- AND POST- CAMPAIGN
ANALYSIS

With AdHive, brands are able to collect data about the current level of public activity and opinions. To prepare or 
enhance campaigns, advertisers can propose a survey for community members to get feedback from the target 
audience. The audience of surveys can be filtered additionally by gender/age/region/interests and by influencer/ 
spectator / both. Surveys can contain any materials and can be focused on any part of the audience. The price will 
be calculated based on demand for a particular audience. 

To remain informed, fit the campaign more precisely to its aim, and to develop relevant creative ideas, advertisers 
can analyze past or current activity on influencer channels with AdHive video analytics. Advertisers can request 
a single analysis or permanent monitoring of all channels or any group of channels. The cost of this monitoring 
consists of a fixed cost of AI modules learning from each brand/object and a variable cost of processing, which 
depends on the intensity and number of minutes of video that need to be analyzed. 

Advertisers can build a very comprehensive monitoring list to track video content and activity of brands and opin-
ions of influencers.

If the duration of the campaign is less than 30 days, then the CPM proposed to the  advertiser will be higher to 
compensate for the missed profit  of the influencers and to provide  additional efforts by the influencer to publish 
videos during the campaign period.

27

https://adhive.tv/


INFLUENCERS 

The Platform is designed to work with influencers and streamers in the same way — by “influencers” we  mean 
video bloggers on Youtube, Instagram etc., as opposed to streamers from Twitch, Smashcast etc. Video recognition 
modules for streams are included in the release of v.07 and will be deployed in 2018. The process and approach for 
streamers will be identical to that of influencers with a small difference in reward calculation. Moreover, influencers 
on Instagram can stream their video, so the difference between influencer and streamer is not so significant now 
and will disappear almost entirely soon.  

All functionality for influencers will be available from the client cabinet with notifications by any channel selected 
or chosen- email, SMS, messengers and app notifications. The wallet will provide the mechanics for convenient 
spending or saving of the Tokens.

Register and verify your 
channel

Choose and accept 
one of the available 
advertising offers 

Make a security deposit Complete the advertising offer 
Receive payment 

after AI verification 

Influencer Workflow

Data from social network channels, keywords for the chan-
nel, type of advertisers with whom the influencer is ready 
to work (FMCG, services, goods, entertainment etc.).

Each channel should be confirmed by the influencer 
to avoid doubling and fraud.

All related proposals from advertisers.

Promotional campaigns (to increase involvement or refer-
ral campaigns).

At  the beginning this information will be available for the 
influencer only, in later releases access could be devel-
oped for advertisers to view and analyze detailed statistics 
of influencers.

Card and crypto wallet details to be able to transfer ADH 
Tokens to crypto and fiat currencies.
Debit card details.

Channel audience statistics.

Feed of advertising 
proposals.

History and previous activi-
ty of the influencer.

Wallet for ADH Token 
and other wallet details.

THERE ARE 5 MAIN DOMAINS IN THE INFLUENCER CABINET:

Personal data Name, email, photo
(optional)

28



After the registration and confirmation of the channel, all relevant advertising tasks will be available for the influencer. 
Each task contains a detailed description with precise words and phrases, picture/object descriptions, certain se-
quences, estimated reward for task execution, duration of campaign, minimal Participation balance, and the amount 
of the Security deposit required to ensure proper task execution. By default, each influencer has 14 days for task 
execution, but an advertiser can change that parameter. The Participation balance is a required minimum balance 
of Tokens in influencers wallet in order to be able to participate in an ad campaign. A minimum balance needs to be 
held by the influencer in order for the influencer to have access to free educational materials including those for vid-
eo blog development and mechanics for blog monetization. The Security deposit is an AdHive Token (ADH) deposit 
which the influencer should make to ensure a proper task execution.

The bigger the potential reward of the influencer, the bigger the Participation balance and Security deposit needed. 
After the successful execution of the task, the Security deposit will be refunded. This refund will take place just after 
the publication of the video and first assessments by the community. In case the influencer refuses to execute or 
does the placements improperly, (The AI module did not recognize the required phrases and objects) the influencer 
loses the Security deposit and it will be sent to the platform. There will, of course, be claims from influencers who 
disagree with the AI module judgment and such issues will be reviewed manually. The required Participation balance 
of Tokens will be calculated based on a math model (Appendix 2). On average, it will be about 10% of the estimated 
reward. The Security deposit will be constant for each group of influencers (depending on the average # of views 
in the first 30 days of the 10 most recent videos of each influencer) and will not exceed of 2-3% of influencer’s 
estimated reward. After applying for the task, the required sum of Tokens will be locked in a smart contract until 
the proper execution of the task. Influencers will see all campaigns  available for them but can apply only to those 
in which the required minimum Participation balance is lower or equal to the balance of Tokens in their wallets.

29



CAMPAIGN ON PLATFORM INFLUENCER

Properly placed ad

Refunded security deposit + reward ADH Tokens

Apply to task

Security deposit

Improperly placed ad or placement refusal

No refund, no reward

RATING SYSTEM AND EFFECT ON REWARDS

Community members assess the advertising effect of ad placement which the influencer has prepared (the me-
chanic is described in detail in the paragraph “Community”). Rating of the video depends on the assessment 
of the measure of advertising attractiveness of the influencer video. Rating of the influencer depends on 
assessments of previous videos of the influencer and their effects on internal CPM (price of task placement) for 
the influencer (details in Appendix #2. Math models and Token mechanics) and on the potential selection of 
influencers for limited campaigns (detailed in paragraph “How It Works--> Advertiser”).

Before applying for a task, each influencer will see a potential reward, estimated by the platform, based on the 
influ-encer’s internal CPM and estimated number of views of his future video. The Estimated reward 
calculation is based on the average # of views in the first 30 days of the 10 most recent videos multiplied by 
the influencer’s CPM, which is enough for influencers to make a rough assessment of possible earnings. The 
Effective reward will be predicted within 7 days after the video is published using The Prediction Module, and 
is based on the math model of linear regression of number of views ratio for 7 and for 30 days from the 
last 25 videos (details in Appendix #2. Math mod-els and Token mechanics). The Reward will be calculated 
as “Number of views in 30 days predicted by platform” * CPM of the influencer.

Token transfers to influencers are made daily during the first 7 days after a video is published. Details of 
calculation of influencer effective reward are as follows: 

After the campaign each participating influencer has a chance to get a bonus for quality of task execution in the 
case that the rating of the video will be in the TOP tier. AdHive will charge 3% from the campaign budget for bonuses 
based on advertisement quality.

• Day after video publishing: refund of Security deposit + “Number of views for the 1st day” * CPM;
• 3nd-7th days: “Number of views for the day” * CPM — for each day from the 2nd to 6th;
• 8th day: Effective reward for the placement — paid amount (Security deposit + 6 days reward);

30



COMMUNITY GROWTH AND INFLUENCER INCENTIVIZING MECHANICS

1. In order to reduce barriers for first play, AdHive will start with a very easy promotional mechanism for
participants with promotional Tokens which could be used as a Security deposit only and will be trans-
ferred to the influencer after the ad task execution in addition to the reward. The rule concerning minimal
Participation balance of Tokens will not be in effect for promo participation.

2. Another mechanism to motivate newly-registered influencers to take part in a first ad campaign is
“AdHive task” with no Token deposit required. This task is to display in some way the Adhive.tv logo
(on a t-shirt or any other object), or to say a specific phrase about AdHive. After that, the influencer will
receive a reward in ADH Tokens in their wallet on the platform. As soon as the Tokens have transferred
into the wallet, a tutorial will be available to help the influencer with tips on how to operate using the
wallet and what the influencer can do with ADH Tokens.

3. During the brand promotional campaign, advertisers can send promo Tokens to influencers to motivate
them to take part in the campaign. Such Tokens can only be received for execution of a particular ad-
vertisement task. If the influencer does not execute the task, the promo Tokens will be returned back to
the advertiser.

COMMUNITY 

The overall mission of the community is to develop native video advertising on influencer channels, to develop new 
ways of brand promotion in social media, to educate influencers as well as advertisers, and to attract new and tal-
ented people into the community. One of the main goals of the community is to help advertisers get more qualitative 
video advertising and to help influencers increase the efficiency of their video monetization. Community members 
can send feedback to influencers about videos and to the platform about fraud issues as well as give feedback on 
how to improve the process. Influencers can receive feedback messages in their profile from the community and 
from the platform. A portal will be organized on the platform for influencer education with feedback, cases, and 
materials, which will be created by platform methodologists and by community members. 

Community members can be influencers, spectators, or people who understand the principles of social video 
advertising and could be involved in campaign execution. Community members will be invited to assess native 
advertisement quality, creativity, and influence on spectators. Each visitor of the website can register and become 
a community member and can be rewarded with ADH Tokens for involvement in such activity. The more accurate 
estimation a member provides and more Tokens held in their wallet for the period of the survey, the larger the reward 
the member receives. The quality assessment of video engagement will be determined by the Swarm Intelligence 
principle.

Register on the platform
Add ADH Tokens 

to your wallet to take part 
in quality assessment  

Take part in quality 
assessment of advertising 

offer completion 

Receive rewards 
in ADH Tokens 

Comminity Members’ Workflow

31



BENEFITS FROM COMMUNITY INVOLVEMENT

Share scenarios and 
ideas with advertisers 
for how to create more 
attractive advertise-
ments.  

Create scenarios, graphics 
and designs for influencers, 
other outsourced work, rent-
al of equipment. 
(AdHive Classified - see 
page 34)

Quality control of video 
ads / identify low quality 
videos. 

Influencers on AdHive 
platforms will be more 
motivated to execute 
tasks properly and 
attractively to view-
ers thanks to AdHive 
assessment mechanics 
and base of learning 
on the platform.

Share knowledge and 
ideas with influencers 
on how to create more 
attractive videos.

Token holders can 
earn Tokens for activity 
on the platform. 

for ADVERTISERS for INFLUENCERS for PLATFORM & COMMUNITY

Develop an expert com-
munity to combine an-
alytics and benchmark 
of influencer activity.

Increase the accuracy 
of AI modules in video 
and speech recognition.

32



Identify fraud schemes 
as well as, inappropriate 
ad placement.

Reduction of operational 
costs.

The higher the assess-
ment of executed tasks, 
the higher the reward.

Develop an expert 
community to assess 
the impact of audience 
engagement and social 
activity on the effec-
tiveness of advertising 
campaigns.

ASSESSMENT BY COMMUNITY MEMBERS

Community members assess the measure of advertisement attractiveness for each video after it is published. The 
assessment is made on a 100-point scale and the objective result is calculated as a weighted mean (trimmed mean) 
value from the pool. Rewards for assessments are paid to those who are more precise, based on dependence of 
difference from mean assessment and the average number of Tokens held by each member during the period of the 
survey (10 days by default). There is an additional bonus available for video assessment during the first 24 hours 
from the time of publication of the video to eliminate cases of fraud. Community rewards for assessment will be 
funded from the advertisement campaign budget. The share of the budget allocated to the community will be about 
5% and it can be changed depending on the activity level of community members. The mathematical model on 
which the reward calculation is based will be continuously adjusted.

To build a smooth and convenient process of video assessment, links to all newly created videos will be published 
on the platform and mobile app, including all notifications which will deliver updates to community members who 
are interested in being  involved. Members can send feedback to the platform or influencer about the style, ap-
proach and quality of the advertisement task execution.

33



In later stages, the algorithm of reward calculations for video assessments will be continuously adjusted depending 
on historical accuracy in order to balance the influence of accuracy and the number of Tokens in the wallet. 

If community members detect an attempt of any influencer to abuse the platform, then the task execution will be 
canceled and the Security deposit will be distributed between members who detected this case. Feedback from 
community members will be used to update AI recognition modules in order to avoid such cases in the future.

ADHIVE CLASSIFIED
Influencers use a lot of services to make their video more attractive, such as creation of scenarios, video editing, 
video effects, rental of equipment and so on. For these services, AdHive Classified will be created, a place with ads 
from community members, mainly focused on influencers. Payments can be made with ADH Tokens. Ad placement 
will be without charge and the authors will have access to statistics of visits by users of the platform. Access to the 
portal will be available to registered users only.

In addition, within the framework of AdHive Classified, a separate rating system will be introduced, which will elim-
inate fraud within the framework of interaction within AdHive Classified.
AdHive Classified will allow the project to increase the community, increase its involvement, solve Influencers’ prob-
lems with content creation, and allow the community to work more closely with influencers.

LEVEL OF COMMUNITY INVOLVEMENT

The Community plays a significant, but not critical, role in platform functionality. AdHive is able to operate without 
a community but would require more operational staff. The first working version of the platform (up to release v.06) 
will function without community involvement; this role will be performed by the moderators. The process of control 
of execution of advertising tasks will be fully automated by the AI   module. The staff of the platform will perform AI 
work checks in requested cases. Influencers will not be rated by the quality of executed advertising tasks and their 
CPM will be the same for an advertising campaign.

AdHive plans to attract community members among the Token holders and plans to develop a vast community 
on the platform. To attract new members, AdHive plans to conduct various incentive programs, including referral 
campaigns. A part of platform’s budget will be allocated to community development, which includes community 
member and influencer attraction schemes. As the number of community members increases, their significance and 
involvement in the functioning of the platform will grow. 

After the core of the community is formed and gains experience in video ad assessment, members will be able to 
advise influencers on how to improve the quality of advertising. The community will reduce manual work for platform 
employees and will increase the efficiency of AI modules.

The number of community members which are involved in the assessment process will be regulated by the budget 
which will be allocated for assessment. 5% of the ad campaign budget will be distributed to involved members 
which will attract enough people to maintain this model.

PLATFORM 

Workflow of the platform

Platform 
receive ad

task

Create
a report

for
advertiser

Create a list 
of appropriate 

influencers

Calculate a 
total price for

campaign

Publish an 
announcement
for influencers

Completion
is verified 

by AI

Reach the
target amount

of views

Calculate # of 
ADH Tokens 
to transfer to 

influencers and 
community
members

34



The AdHive platform will be an effective tool for native video ad placement, and executive participants of the plat-
form will be interested in getting new notifications of offers as quickly as possible to have an opportunity to apply 
first.  All activities will be guaranteed with a deposit of ADH Tokens and participants must have the required amount 
of Tokens in their wallets. The ideology of the platform architecture and interface development policy is the ability to 
react fast and with the confidence that the placement is properly done.

To reach the target amount of views required by the advertiser, the platform proposes to all the relevant influencers 
an advertisement task. Influencers who apply for the task are able to execute the task. A task is available until the 
required amount of influencers deliver the required amount of views. The estimation is based on the average 
number of views of each of the last 10 videos on the channel in the first 30 days. Evaluation is carried out for each 
influencer that has applied, including a reserve for refusals.

The Prediction Module recalculates and corrects the estimated number of views within 7 days after each video 
is published. Each day the platform assesses the factual traction of the campaign and attracts other influencers 
if the number of views is less than the earlier estimate or the percentage of refusals is more than predicted. If the 
number of influencers executing the task is not enough to reach the required target amount of views, the platform 
will increase the CPM of this campaign for new applicants to attract more influencers. The Platform will execute the 
advertisement task internationally and after the campaign budget is disbursed, the platform will generate a report 
for the advertiser about the campaign. 

The final price of the campaign for the advertiser will remain the same as it was calculated at first. Factual number 
of viewers may differ from the estimated ±10%, as it depends on the size of the campaign. The campaign report 
contains factual CPM and factual audience parameters. In order to prevent spamming of the platform, each action 
with a Security deposit will require a small transaction fee, which will be withheld from influencers. To prevent the sit-
uation of a Sybil attack during video assessment from affecting the rewards, the calculation of the reward depends 
of the amount of Tokens held in the wallet.

In order to make the platform accessible from the very beginning, the primary communications will be organized via 
chatbots integrated in popular instant messengers. AdHive will enable users to submit new proposals, get notifica-
tions about proposals, and inquire about additional information.

BACK-END

The Platform will be initially designed for high performance and productivity, and modular architecture will provide 
the required level of flexibility.

1. The Matching module obtains an appropriate list of influ-
encers for and advertisers needs and assesses the time,
cost, and engagement rate of the campaign by using de-
tailed descriptions of the audience of each influencer.

2. The Recognition module arranges an execution check.
The Moderator will need to develop the particular skills of
the AI module.

3. The Payment module is based on smart
contracts in order to transfer prescribed
amounts of ADH Tokens to influencers af-
ter the trigger of execution is enacted.

4. The Analytics module collects success-
ful triggers and combines with the dash-
board.

35



TECHNOLOGY5

The AdHive platform is a web service with integrated AI modules for Video and Speech Recognition and Trigger 
Detection. Modules control the placement of advertising material on each channel mentioned in the influencers’ 
profiles. Channels are monitored daily for video updates and the AI module sends triggers to the platform in the case 
of proper execution of an ad task. To verify the proper execution of the task, video recognition modules analyze all 
video updates from the channels connected to the platform.

To start a campaign an advertiser must create a clear task for the influencers. Moderators from AdHive check the 
task and confirm it or comment on it. If the task is feasible and paid, it is transferred to AdHive content managers 
who teach the modules to recognize the specific target actions which can be words, phrases or objects in the vid-
eo. Video and audio recognition modules should be updated each time a new task is placed. There is a Traintool 
that is a part of the system, and it provides quick upload and adaptation of the learning content, training the neural 
networks in the AI modules.

The AdHive platform is easy to scale thanks to the web application development technology WebVane Framework. 
The framework is used for the creation of business apps with web-based interfaces and it is capable of significant-
ly accelerating the development of basic administrative and business functions and methods, as well as quickly 
changing the settings to meet new requirements. 
Details of technological solutions are described in APPENDIX 1.

INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY (IP) OWNERSHIP

Video and audio recognition technology and WebVane Framework were developed by the founders of the AdHive 
Platform and are owned by fully controlled Scorchai Inc. After the crowdsale campaign is done, all IP which is re-
quired for the platform and module execution and further development will be transferred to the AdHive project.

A technical audit of this IP and IP transfer procedures will be organized by a well-known and accredited international 
IP consulting company and this report will be delivered to Token owners.

DEMO OF RECOGNITION TECHNOLOGY

These demo videos were taken from public Youtube channels and analyzed for the presence of well-known brands, 
using video and voice recognition.

36



Below is the Indonesian language, but we still can find some brands without additional learning:

• https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ptKuDIbEXMs
• https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-bbRP-Hn1Eo
• https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ptKuDIbEXMs
• https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DRY9Ei_Kxrc
• https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=t8IYwnXgAj4
• https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Fb0pX27ww7s

Originals:

ADHIVE CLASSIFIED

Influencers use a lot of services to make their video more attractive such as creation of scenarios, video editing, 
video effects, rental of equipment and so on. For these services, AdHive Classified will be created, a place with ads 
from community members, mainly focused on influencers. Payments can be made with ADH Tokens. Ad placement 
will be without charge and the authors will have access to statistics of visits by users of the platform. Access to the 
portal will be available to registered users only. 

WEB UI

payments 
moduleadvertiser wallet

influencer wallet prediction/evaluationmodule

line management
module

influencers DB

influencers ratings register

AI controller

video loader / scheduler

ad
m

in
is

tr
at

iv
e 

U
I

train
tool

Youtube otherFacebook /Instagramm

community 
wallet

Common Architecture of AdHive Platform

37

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ptKuDIbEXMs
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-bbRP-Hn1Eo
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ptKuDIbEXMs
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DRY9Ei_Kxrc
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=t8IYwnXgAj4
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Fb0pX27ww7s


Web Site and Administrative UI

Company account

Advertiser account

Broker account

Exchange module

Video Loader/ Scheduler

AI controller Payments module

Order management module
Influencers DB

Train tool
Influencer wallet

Influencers ratings register 

Modules representing Web user interface and busi-
ness logic of service users.

Company crypto wallet or bank account.

Advertiser account in internal system.

AdHive account on fiat currencies exchange.

Module ensures we have enough ADH Tokens 
or fiat currencies to deal with platform participants 
using Cryptocurrency Exchange API.

Module allowing loading of video from influenc-
er channels and execution of scheduled tasks for 
checking videos.

AI service for video and speech recognition. Module responsible for Token and crypto or fiat 
currencies transfer, see brief description below.

Module responsible for creation and monitoring of 
advertisement tasks. Influencers database with updatable statistics.

Web UI based tool for creating new datasets (new 
brands, languages, words) for AI controller. Influencer internal account.

Register forms a influencer’s digital rating.

PAYMENTS MODULE

Provides API for currencies and Tokens exchange for internal ADH Token calculations.

Company account

AdHive broker account Cryptocurrency exchange

In
flu

en
ce

r a
cc

ou
nt

Ad
ve

rt
is

er
 a

cc
ou

nt

C
om

m
un

ity
 m

em
be

r a
cc

ou
nt

Equation and hedging 
module

• Buy order
• Sell order

Payments module

38



ADHIVE TOKEN AND FINANCIAL MODEL6

AdHive Token (ADH) — is a native cryptographic project Token, which gives participants the right to access multiple 
activities and services of the AdHive network. ADH Token has a critical role inside the AdHive ecosystem and is 
designed to be used for the following utilities:

ADH Tokens are based on the Ethereum platform in accordance with the ERC20 standard — the most convenient 
and compatible with many Ethereum wallets and exchanges. Smart contracts provide robust and secure payment 
mechanisms and distribution of rewards. There is a limited supply of ADH Tokens and they cannot be reproduced 
by anyone. The ERC-20 standard involves the introduction of small commissions for transactions in ADH Tokens, 
which will be paid by platform participants. For stable functioning of the platform, AdHive will use nodes located on 
its own server.

AdHive has a partnership with Bancor. AdHive utilization of the Bancor protocol effectively eliminates the liquidity 
risk for ADH Token holders. The Bancor protocol provides exchange mechanisms for ADH Tokens through Token 
Changer — a combination of exchange and market-maker, based on smart contract. Token Changer is a smart 
Token that holds 2 or more digital assets in its reserve and is used to exchange between ADH Tokens, BNT Tokens, 
ETH, etc. The main advantages of using Token Changer:

1. A reward for participants. Participants are rewarded for actions such as advertisement placement on
video, native advertising assessment, and completion of surveys.

2. A Security deposit and minimum Participation balance. To apply for ad placement, participants must use
Tokens. This will increase motivation to execute tasks properly.

3. A daily transactions instrument. Smart-contract payment solutions allow to make Token transfers daily
to make financial management more flexible.

4. Complementary services. Advertisers can spend ADH Tokens for analysis of all video channels to detect
usage of keywords and brands they are interested in.management more flexibility.

5. Network growth driver. The AdHive platform will reward participants for registering and maintaining ac-
tive involvement in the ecosystem. Members of the community can also participate in referral campaigns
to promote the AdHive platform.

6. Anti-spam prevention tool. Influencers will pay a security deposit for applying to ad tasks.
7. Sybil-attack protection. To prevent a Sybil attack during video assessment from affecting the rewards,

the calculation of rewards for community members will depend of the amount of Tokens held in wallet.
8. Payment for platform services. Advertisers will be motivated to use ADH Tokens for launching cam-

paigns and for monitoring video channels.

9. Payments between participants. AdHive Classified provides additional services paid with ADH Tokens.
10. Compatibility. Easy integration to listing on cryptocurrency exchanges.

1. Easy way of buying or selling of ADH Tokens directly through Token Changer smart contract without
need of using cryptocurrency exchange.

2. Very high level of liquidity and lower volatility rate from the first day of trading.
3. Lower commission costs, zero spread, no risks of hacking or fraud issues of crypto exchanges.

39



ADVANTAGES OF BLOCKCHAIN TECHNOLOGY IMPLEMENTATION

INCENTIVES TO USE ADH TOKEN 

Usage of Blockchain and ADH Token will eliminate the boundaries of interaction between advertisers, influencers, 
and community members around the world. This is what makes AdHive a global advertising platform.

Main advantages of Blockchain technology implementation:

AdHive Tokens are not Proof-of-Asset Tokens and are not a security under any circumstances. There is no 
promise of profit or any future value, and the Tokens are solely used as a right of access and use of plat-
form services. AdHive Tokens do not constitute a currency equivalent as they are not issued by any gov-
ernment or central issuer, nor do they represent any relationship or rights to the ownership of the protocol. 

1. Settlement system — a real-time, cost-effective, transparent, and secure settlement model for adver-
tisers, influencers and community members.

2. Effective involvement and incentivizing mechanics — Flexible calculation mechanics for users to
provide long-term participation interest  in the development of the platform.

3. Reliability and confidence in agreed terms of each campaign — Smart contracts provide a safe and
secure way to arrange agreements between advertisers, influencers, and other subjects of the platform.

4. Worldwide coverage — an easy way to make calculations for each individual influencer or community
member in different countries and in different languages, which automatically solves three major prob-
lems of:

5. Collaboration with other crypto platforms — wide capabilities for integration and cooperation.

• Financial clearing;
• Regulatory paperwork;
• High commissions for the conversion of fiat currencies and bank transfers of a large

number of fiat micropayments;

FOR ADVERTISERS

To promote the usage of ADH Tokens in Adhive.tv, an incentive program will be running during the first year. If an 
advertiser funds his account with ADH Tokens or cryptocurrencies with instant conversion into ADH Tokens at the 
current exchange rate, they will instantly receive 2.5% as a bonus in their wallet to use it for ad campaign payments 
only. When the liquidity of ADH Tokens increases, the amount of incentive bonuses for using ADH Tokens will grad-
ually decrease. This program will motivate advertisers to use AdHive Tokens and benefit from growing blockchain 
ecosystems. With AdHive, any advertiser can take advantage of native advertising possibilities to grow their busi-
ness.

40



ADVERTISER

FOR INFLUENCERS, COMMUNITY MEMBERS AND OTHER TOKEN HOLDERS

In order to participate in ad campaigns running over the AdHive platform, users are required to purchase and hold 
long-term ADH Tokens to be able to apply them to various advertising and quality assessments tasks. This me-
chanic should motivate all the participants to execute tasks properly. As the platform develops and the audience 
of users grows, demand for ADH Tokens will increase, but the total amount of Tokens never exceeds the number 
initially issued.

The Platform also proposes a way of earning ADH Tokens as a reward for user endeavors. 

To provide platform operations, AdHive will make regular purchases of ADH Tokens on cryptocurrency exchanges. 
This model maintains high demand for ADH Tokens by platform users and by the AdHive platform itself, 
creating a direct relationship between the success of the project and the potential growth of the Token: the more 
users on the platform, the more Tokens are involved with internal payments, the greater the demand and liquidity 
of the Token on the cryptocurrency markets. In time, as ADH Token is utilized by more users and adopted by more 
project partners, it will bring significant growth and value to the AdHive ecosystem.

ADHIVE PLATFORM

CRYPTOCURRENCY
EXCHANGE

INFLUENCERS AND 
COMMUNITY MEMBERS

Cryptocurrency exchange by Token buyers

BENEFITS FOR TOKEN HOLDERS
• The ADH Token is the core infrastructural element of the platform. AdHive provides a real and effective

solution for current market problems;

• Stable positive traction during next 2-3 years — we already have client funnels;

• ADH Token is a utility Token, all payments on platform, including payments for additional services, are
executed in ADH Token and all users will be motivated to keep some of their ADH Tokens on the platform;

• Revenues of the company will be stored in ADH tokens, and will be converted to fiat money only as
required for project development;

• Demand for the ADH Token will be driven by multiple agencies along with AdHive activity;

• Liquidity of ADH Token will be provided by Bancor Token Changer;

• Number of long term Token holders (influencers, community members, the platform) will grow, while To-
ken supply will remain limited to the initially issued amount;

• Number of medium-term Token holders (advertisers carrying out marketing campaigns) will also increase
as the platform develops.

41



ACCOUNTS, MONEY AND TOKEN TRANSFER 7

The Adhive.tv payment system operates on the basis of blockchain technology. An automated payment system will 
use smart contracts to provide maximum transparency and flexibility for all participants: advertisers, influencers, 
and community members. All the calculations on the platform between the participants are made with a native cryp-
tographic Token — the AdHive Token (ADH), thus the ADH Token is a core element of the platform and will be used 
for the building and development of the ecosystem. A cryptocurrency wallet will be created automatically for each 
user after the registration on the AdHive platform. 

Acquisition, utilization, and exchange of ADH Tokens will be very simple and straightforward for users of the plat-
form. For operations with Tokens such as funding and transferring from personal accounts of platform users, an 
Exchange Module will be developed which will be used for instant exchange between the fiat and cryptocurrencies. 
The module will be integrated through Bancor protocol, which enables built-in price discovery and a liquidity man-
agement mechanism for ADH Tokens with help of Token Changer. Token changer is a smart Token which holds 2 or 
more digital assets in its reserve, smart Token can be used to exchange between ADH Tokens and BNT Tokens or 
any other Tokens that are held in the reserve. The BNT Token is a smart Token with ETH in its reserve, which makes 
conversion possible from or to ETH fast and easy. For AdHive purposes, in order to keep ADH Token volatility under 
control, we will use about 2-4% of AdHive market cap in Token changer reserve. Smart Tokens will be backed by 
BNT Tokens, which will increase confidence in ADH Token usage by advertisers and influencers. It decreases vol-
atility and makes it more convenient to use ADH Tokens for advertisers and influencers for long-term campaigns.

WAYS AND OPTIONS OF FUNDING

1. FIAT currencies. In their profile, the user adds and authorizes the data of their bank account /debit
card/ electronic payment system (PayPal, Skrill, Yandex.money, etc) and specifies the required amount
for funding. The AdHive platform automatically converts the deposited money into ADH Tokens at the
current exchange rate with help of the Exchange Module. The Advertiser is able to choose the currency
balance to be funded between ADH Tokens and local fiat currency.

2. Cryptocurrencies. An Advertiser is able to fund their cryptocurrency wallet with any cryptocurrency or
Token which automatically converts to ADH Tokens at the current exchange rate plus a platform com-
mission.

ADVERTISER ACCOUNT

The advertiser payment account is divided into two balances: ADH Tokens and local official currency of the local 
country of the advertiser. Credits on the advertiser’s account can be stored in ADH Tokens or in local currency and 
transferred between each other, according to the advertiser’s preferences. Regulation of currency exchange opera-
tions will start from general supervision and will be updated later, in order to avoid the use of crypto-fiat currencies 
exchange operations on the platform for non-campaign related needs.

Payments between the advertiser and the platform are made in ADH Tokens or in the local currency of the advertis-
er depending on the chosen payment method for each separate advertising campaign. In the case of payment for 
advertising campaigns in the local currency, the  Exchange Module will automatically convert it into ADH Tokens.

42



Acquisition, utilization and exchange of ADH Token by advertisers

Exchange module

Advertiser Influencer

Fiat currency,
Crypto currency

Fiat currency,
Crypto currency

2 3

41

The Campaign budget will be blocked on the advertiser’s account or locked in a smart contract for the period of the 
campaign. At any moment, the advertiser can withdraw available funds from his account in the same way he had 
added credit to it earlier. ADH Tokens can be transferred to an Ethereum compatible crypto wallet from which the 
account balance was funded or to the crypto wallet specified in the advertiser’s account.

INFLUENCER/COMMUNITY MEMBER ACCOUNT

Influencers and community members can receive Tokens either from a crowdsale, bounty campaigns, or by buying 
ADH Tokens on the platform wallet with fiat currencies. Payments between the platform and influencers or com-
munity members are made in ADH Tokens. Payments are performed automatically by smart contracts. Once the 
required conditions are met (AI reports, ad task execution by influencer, or community member completed a survey) 
a smart contract triggers the payment system, and the required number of ADH Tokens are transferred to the user.

Exchange module

Bounty

Influencer / Community
member

Token

Debit card or 
electronic payment

system

Cryptocurrency
exchange

Security Deposit 
(for influencers)

Buy or sell

Reward for executed task
+ refund of deposit

Acquisition, utilization and exchange 
of ADH Token by influencers 
and community members

Conversion to fiat systems

43



A influencer or community member can easily withdraw ADH Tokens and have them sent to electronic payment 
systems or a pre-authorized debit card. They can also transfer ADH Tokens from their crypto wallet to any other 
Ethereum compatible crypto wallet. The platform will automatically exchange ADH Tokens to the local fiat currency 
of the user or to any listed cryptocurrency at the current exchange rate. In the future the platform participants can 
order an ADH debit card for instant payments with ADH Tokens.

TAXES

AdHive is not a tax agent and transfers the full amount of income to the influencer/community member debit card 
or crypto wallet, and the influencer/community member is fully responsible for declaring and paying taxes in accor-
dance with the jurisdiction of the country of which they are a tax-paying resident.

TOKEN SALE8

The total amount of Tokens released will be 450 000 000 ADH. An additional release of Tokens will not take 
place, and if all of the Tokens available for Token Sale Participants are not sold during the Token Sale Phase #1, the 
remaining Tokens will be destroyed. Upon completion of the Token Sale Phase #1, the Tokens will immediately 
become available for distribution among the Token Sale participants.

 

6% 16%

60%

11.5%

2%

3.5%

1%

Advisory board

Community grants & Bounties

Legal compliance Reserve fund

AdHive founders

Network growth

Token sale participants

(6-months uniform vesting)

(including testing and bug bounty) (18-months vesting schedule)

CURRENT TOKEN ALLOCATION:

60% for Token Sale Participants:
Amount of Tokens available for Presale + Token Sale Phase #1 is 30% of released ADH, while the amount of 
Tokens available for Token Sale Phase #2 is 30% accordingly. All figures will be finalized following the 
forecasting results on the Wings platform and be announced at least 5 days before the Token Sale Phase #1 
begins. 

44



16% for Network growth — Tokens for growth and maintenance of the world-wide community and expanding the 
adoption of the AdHive platform. These Tokens will provide community development, attract strategic partners, and 
remunerate key project team members. The first part of 6% will be vested the next day after the successful comple-
tion of the crowdsale campaign, and the second part of 10% be a subject to an 18 months uniform vesting period.

11.5% of AdHive Founders Tokens  will be stored on the MultiSig with an 18-month vesting schedule with 3 
equal portions to vest. The first part will be vested the next day after the successful completion of the crowdsale 
campaign, and the subsequent two parts in 9 and 18 months, respectively. These funds ensure long-term 
alignment of interests of founders and Token Sale participants.

The current AdHive Token exchange rate is 1 ADH = 0.0002 ETH (1 ETH = 5000 ADH).
Tokens will be priced in all accepted currencies. Due to the high level of volatility of ETH, the official conversion rate 
for the crowdsale campaign will be announced a 6 hours before the start of Presale.

REFERRAL PROGRAM (PRESALE AND TOKEN SALE PHASE 1)

You get a 4% bonus of all referrals, who bought Tokens. In case the amount of Tokens bought by all referrals in a 

month is greater than 500 000 ADH, a referrer gets a 5% bonus.

Additional bonus for referrals is 1%.

PRESALE
Most of the collected funds through the Presale campaign will be used for further development, legal and consulting 
services and promotion of the Token Sale campaign.

AdHive Presale allows participants to contribute early and to get up to 31% bonus, before the Token Sale begins.
The start of the Token Presale is scheduled for January 31st, 2018 at 14:00 UTC and will last until February 6th, 
2018 at 14:00 UTC or when the Tokens available for Token Presale participants are sold out, whichever is earlier.

Presale target: $3 million (for Private Presale, Whitelist Presale and Public Presale)

Presale Bonuses:

• Day 1-3 (Jan 31 – Feb 2): 20% Bonus
• Day 4-7 (Feb 3 – Feb 6): 15% Bonus

Presale Whitelist Details:

Whitelist registration ends on January 27th, at 14:00 UTC (London time).

The Whitelist Presale is held one day before the Public Presale, and it is open only for 
Whitelist participants with an additional special bonus of 10%. The Whitelist Presale starts on January 30th, 2018, 
at 14:00 UTC and will last only 24 hours.

During the Public Presale, starting January 31th, a 5% whitelist bonus will be available.

45



TOKEN SALE PHASE #1

The start of the Token Sale Phase #1 is scheduled for February 28th, 2018 at 14:00 UTC and will last until 14:00 UTC 
March 14th, 2018, or until the amount of Tokens available for Token Sale Participants sold out, 
whichever takes place earlier. On the first day (the first 24 hours before 14:00 UTC on March 1st, 2018) only Whitelist 
participants can participate in Token Sale Phase 1.

The Token Sale will be considered successful if $4mln is reached (soft cap). Otherwise, all funds will be refunded 
to the participants.

Token Sale Phase #1 target: $12 million

Bonus scheme for Token Sale Phase #1:

• Day 1 (February 28) – 10% Bonus only for Whitelist participants
• Day 2-3 (March 1 – March 2) – 5% Bonus
• Day 4-7 (March 3 – March 6) – 2.5% Bonus
• Day 8-15 (March 7 – March 14) – 0% Bonus

Token Sale Phase #1 Whitelist details: 
Whitelist registration ends on February 24 at 14:00 UTC (London time).

To be Whitelisted, you must first pass the KYC procedure in your personal account. For more details, please visit our site 
https://adhive.tv/

All figures will be finalized following the forecasting results on the Wings platform and be announced at least 5 
days before the Token Sale begins.

At the end of the Token Sale Phase #1, all Tokens sold during the Presale + Token Sale Phase #1 are 

considered to be 30% of total supply, 30% will be allocated to Token Sale Phase #2 (overall - 60% for Token 

Sale Participants), 16% will be allocated to the Network growth pool, the remaining 24% will be allocated for 

distribution to AdHive founders, advisors, community grants & bounties, legal compliance and reserve fund.

TOKEN SALE PHASE #2

The start of the Token Sale Phase #2 is scheduled for Q3-Q4 2019.

This phase will be divided into several portions, so as not to affect the market situation. Token exchange rate will be 
announced 5 days before the start of Token Sale Phase #2 and will be based on the Token market value. All 
participants of Presale and Token Sale Phase #1 will receive an additional 10% bonus for their second purchase with 
small vesting period. The maximum purchase amount with an additional bonus will be announced later and will be 
proportional to the amount of their initial contribution on Presale and Token Sale Phase #1.

The AdHive Token Sale proceeds will be used to develop and promote the AdHive project. Fund distribution and other 
detailed information of the execution plan is described in Chapter 9: Business model and execution plan. All Token 
Sale proceeds will be stored on the MultiSig wallet. 

This Whitepaper does not constitute a Public Offer Contract, any legal or binding document or shall not be 
considered as any terms of a crowdsale campaign or providing any legal, investment or tax advices. 

46

https://adhive.tv/


BUSINESS MODEL AND EXECUTION PLAN 9

BUSINESS MODEL 

The business model of the project is the re-selling of contacts with influencers’ audiences and providing comple-
mentary services for video monitoring and analysis. The AdHive platform buys the views from influencers with dis-
count, influencers gain access to mass advertising campaigns, and advertisers get an integrated media channel for 
targeted message delivery and analysis of video content for brands and keyword mentions. It’s similar to contextual 
advertising, but in video format. 

The platform margin is generated from the gap between bid and offer prices and should always remain sufficient 
because small influencers are happier to work for lower rewards, and in addition, advertisers are happier to avoid 
collaboration with large groups of influencers. Influencers will sell their contacts with their audience through whole-
sale prices, for access to large campaigns. The margin of each placement can differ depending on the goal of the 
placement — either to grow the margins, or to grow the involvement of rating influencers.

For example, each 1000 views (CPM)  costs 20 ADH Tokens for the advertiser, while the influencer gets 14 ADH for 
each 1000 views, 1 ADH per each 1000 views transfers to the community for assessment, 5 ADH is retained by the 
platform.

PROJECT DEVELOPMENT 

The funds raised through the crowdsale campaign will be allocated to development and promotion of the AdHive 
project. To achieve the project milestones it will be necessary to build highly-competent international team to devel-
op and promote the platform in different countries. For the promotion of crypto projects, we plan to launch interna-
tional operations from the beginning. For advertisers who pay in fiat currencies we will prepare commercial launch 
on the EU and Russian markets to be ready for global roll-out. The first commercial traction will be achieved in Q4 
2017.

TRACTION

The main internal risk is the accuracy and effectiveness of using AI for such an application. We believe that some 
successful commercial implementations of the key elements of this project such as video recognition modules for 
media industry have neutralized the risk of proof-of-concept stages and have opened the way to further develop-
ment and scaling.

47



• Smart TV operators use our models to determine the appearance of particular product placements on the
screen to immediately show overlay ads. With our modules they can avoid creating highly sophisticated
timetables of each block of video content depending on what channel it is delivered to. Depending on
the region, there are different lengths of regional commercial breaks added into the broadcast so there
is no easy way to understand the exact time of particular product placement appearance.  Our modules
recognize elements with 97+% accuracy and our servers could be easily expanded depending on traffic.
This can help determine the exact moment of product appearance regardless of length of commercial
break.

• Brand analytics on YouTube channels. An international FMCG brand launched a pilot project with
Scorch.AI to analyze 100+ YouTube influencers and find keywords from the list about products of the
brand and competitors.

• The first pure AdHive traction will be shown during the crowdsale bounty campaigns — influencers will be
granted ADH Tokens automatically when they pronounce the word “adhive”, or if they are wearing AdHive
T-shirt on video. Influencers should get in contact with AdHive via blogger@adhive.tv to get the AdHive
T-shirt. This will be the alpha version of the platform.

48

http://scorch.ai/
mailto:blogger@adhive.tv


ENGINEERING

BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT

There are two main domains in AdHive platform development — The platform (web service) and AI.

AdHive’s development strategy is different for each stage of the project. In the first stage, AdHive will be focused on 
the US, Europe and Russia to increase the speed of development and reduce risk. In these countries, the AdHive 
team has business connections and an understanding of the business approach, and will be able to quickly become 
integrated in the advertising industry environment.

After the platform becomes operationally stable within several different markets, the second stage will begin with 
scaling to the Asian market. The platform will launch in China first and then will open in countries with large popula-
tions, high penetration of social networks and video services, and with significant advertising budgets which can be 
spread across video channels. Additional parameters of country potential to be considered are the average level of 
internal production of professional video content for TV and internet as well as type of video content consumption. 
Influencers in such countries could become great promoters and AdHive will help them to develop in the media 
industry.

To enter each country’s market, AdHive plans to open a local office in order to establish a relationship with local 
advertisers, find influencers and promote the platform to both influencers and advertisers. Distribution of a remote 
professional team is also under consideration for this stage. Local offices will solve all legal and operational issues 
in the local markets and arrange sales and influencer acquisitions through the basic guidelines.

Each country will have supervisors who will be responsible for the launch and growth of the Platform in the country 
and this function will be globally governed by TOP management. Country managers will be recruited to AdHive from 
international ad-tech or global e-commerce platforms. After the 2d country in the roll-out list is launched success-
fully, a franchising program will be developed to deliver the service to other countries.

• AI

• PLATFORM

The AI recognition team will develop recognition modules to improve accuracy and reduce time and costs of train-
ing. The team already has a pipeline of solutions to be launched - emotion detection (2018), deep integration with 
speech recognition solutions (2018) and action detection (2018-19) are set to be delivered on schedule. After the 
crowdsale campaign, this team will be enhanced significantly.

We are looking for AI advisors with broad experience in optimized algorithm development.

The Web-service team will be split into two parts: back-end and front-end. Back-end will include all blockchain solu-
tions, payment and administrative services, and mobile and live stream domains. The Front-end development will 
contain platform localization teams which can be partly located in some countries where the platform will operate.

Business advisors from fast-scaling companies in Ad-tech and e-commerce will be involved in the project immedi-
ately after the crowdsale campaign.

49



MARKETING AND PR

COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT

ROLL-OUT PLAN

The marketing budget contains local and international campaigns which will be managed differently. Local cam-
paigns will be under the Managing Director (MD) of the country and focused on particular communities. All local 
campaigns will be result-driven with KPI in conversion rates of new influencer registrations or new campaigns on the 
platform. Global international marketing campaigns are focused on influencer community development, influencer 
promos, and spreading information about opportunities. These campaigns will use influencers and other channels 
to distribute success cases and heat up the market.

The marketing budget will be spread across all the countries from the list in order to attract influencers to the AdHive 
community so that it is possible to achieve a critical mass of traffic and launch large advertising campaigns for the 
main target groups of the audience. Influencers and celebrities in each national market will be very helpful for pro-
motion. By a rough estimation, we need to attract more than 1000 influencers in each country to make operations 
massive and referable.

We will allocate a significant part of the budget for platform community growth and development, as well as knowl-
edge and experience transfer on how to use the platform tools in order to earn money as a professional influencer. 
Education and training of influencers and advertisers in addition to development of the community will create more 
independent channels for spreading information and increasing the number of influencers on the AdHive platform.

There are two main goals of the community development process — to increase the number of members and to 
increase the engagement of influencers with advertisers. The first steps in industry development is education on 
both parts of the process — increasing the number of AdHive clients and increasing the involvement of the com-
munity. Influencers will receive guidelines, tips, and overviews on how to improve the attractiveness of their video 
content, how to communicate with subscribers, etc. All the training will be based on case studies. For advertisers, 
we will prepare successful cases of ad placement on influencer channels, tips how to structure the campaign, how 
to launch it, which metrics to use, etc. These will also be based on analysis of previous campaigns.

The AdHive roll-out plan is based on business development strategy and is split into stages:

1. EU and Russia — to build a basic service and prove commercial potential.
2. US — to enter into a new market, localise service and achieve target unit economics.
3. China — to enter the region via the biggest Asian market.
4. Asia, Middle East, LATAM, Australia and New Zealand.

50



By the time the basic service is developed for the EU and Russian markets and operations are stabilised, AdHive’s 
own industry research will be complete for US as a market with high potential. After the expansion to the Canadian 
market, entry to each country will cost about $3mln, which is required for company establishment, hiring of industry 
professionals, compliance with legal and financial regulations, and the first two years of operation. After that peri-
od, each branch will either be profitable or will close. Each country should be operationally profitable within 12-24 
months from the start of operations, and every 6 months we will assess the potential of the country and decide the 
plan for the next half year.

The estimated cost of project development and roll-out includes software and business development, local and 
global marketing, legal and administrative costs, and community development. The marketing budget is split to lo-
cal PR campaigns and marketing coverage in local press and locations. All international campaigns will be covered 
by the global marketing budget. Depending on the amount of money collected during the crowdsale campaign, 
AdHive will adjust the roll-out plan. The goal of the crowdsale is to collect funds for the 1st wave of the roll-out. 
Expanding the platform to other countries will be financed from the generated revenue and Token Sale Phase #2.

$ mln

3,5

6,5

10,0

12,0

15,0

18,0

19,5

21,0

22,5

EU & 
Russia

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X X

X

X

X

X

X X

US China Canada Korea Japan India Pakistan Indonesia Philippines MexicoBrazil

All the collected funds will be spent for the roll-out of countries of the 1st wave

51



BUDGET

Calculations are made by taking into account that the crowdsale was successful and all funds are collected. In this 
case the distribution of funds will be close to this table, according to our models:

If we collect less than cap value, distribution will be slightly different but still focused on key goals of the project:

During the scaling process the share of each type of cost will change by the logic of scaling. The share of software 
development and global marketing in each country will decrease. The share of local marketing and local adminis-
tration costs will remain roughly the same. The share of business development and global legal & administration will 
grow due to expanding organizational structure and number of regions where the platform operates.

2 728 000
44%

2 880 000
45%

1 734 000
51%

1 040 000
52%

980 000
49%

2019

9 362 000

3 410 000
55%

3 200 000
50%

1 530 000
45%

900 000
45%

980 000
49%

2018

10 020 000

62 000
1%

320 000
5%

136 000
4%

60 000
3%

40 000
2%

2017

> 3 mln > 8 mln > 12 mln > 15 mln

618 000

6 200 000

45% 40% 38% 35%

6 400 000

28% 29% 29% 30%

3 400 000

12% 13% 14% 15%

2 000 000

10% 10% 10% 10%

2 000 000

5% 8% 9% 10%

20 000 000

31%

32%

17%

10%

10%

100%

Software and infrastructure
development 

Marketing

Business development 

Legal and administration costs 

Community development

Software and infrastructure
development 

Marketing

Business development 

Legal and administration costs 

Community development

Project expenses, $

Budget allocation

Total expences

52

> 18 mln

31%

32%

17%

10%

10%



REVENUE FORECAST

PROJECT ROADMAP

Based on the premise that influencers have existed, on average, for the same time period in each country and that 
they started with YouTube and have similar prerequisites for development, we can extend market data to several 
markets to make a rough estimation of financial and basic forecast metrics. A huge effect of AdHive development 
will be penetration of crypto currencies in the world, inparticular in countries from our roll-out list, which is not taken 
into account in the estimation below:

By our estimates, all collected funds will be enough for financing all AdHive operations until the end of 2019. Further 
platform and community development and growth will be funded from generated profit and Token Sale Phase #2.

2017 2018 2019 2020

618 000 10 020 000 9 362 000 9 362 000

- 1 680 000
5 000

480
3 500

9 720 000
20 000
2 160
4 500

19 800 000
30 000

3 600
5 500

- 672 000 3 693 600 6 732 000

- 618 000 - 9 348 000 - 5 668 400 - 2 630 000 

Total expenses

Revenue
# of active bloggers
# of campaigns
Rev per campaign

Gross Profit

EBITDA

Budget allocation

Project development

First client for video 
recognition from me-
dia industry

US, UK, Germany, 
Russia

- Token Sale
- Activation of Bancor

Token Changer
- ADH Token listing

Canada, Spain, Chi-
na, Korea, Japan

Advertisers can 
hedge the risks for 
high value campaigns 
with AdHive risk man-
ager

Brazil, France, India, 
Philippines, Mexico

Identification of 
brand/logo/object/
phrase on video 
to analyze the im-
pact of ads on lives-
treams connected to 
the platform

2017 2018 2019 2020

v.06

v.10

53



AdHive idea con-
ceived, customer de-
velopment conduct-
ed

Alpha-version of the 
platform 

Negotiations with 
partners, Token sale 
preparation

MVP with minimum 
functionality for ad 
campaign start

Credit the account 
with several crypto-
currencies 

Chat-bots in main 
messengers to in-
crease participant 
engagement 

Integration with FB

Users can exchange 
ADH into several 
crypto and fiat cur-
rencies on platform 

Mobile app for no-
tifications on IOS/
Android to track new 
proposals from ad-
vertisers

Ready-to-use plat-
form for YouTube 

Integration with Insta-
gram

Rating for influencers 
depends on commu-
nity assessment 

Integration with debit 
card providers for in-
stant payments with 
ADH Tokens 

Control of real time 
ad placement on 
streaming platforms 
(Twitch, TBD) 

Platform launched on 
local social networks

Metadata and back-
ground analysis 
on video channels

Regular International 
campaigns for adver-
tisers

Education mechan-
ics for influencers 
and advertisers to in-
crease campaign effi-
ciency 

AdHive Classified —
alpha version

Integration with 
web studios for on-
line production and 
placement on differ-
ent networks

Metadata and back-
ground analysis on 
live streams

Integration with tools 
for online CG effects

Identification of the 
impact of ads on live 
streams

v.03

v.07
v.08

v.02

v.01

v.04

v.09

v.05

v.11
v.12

v.13

54



Community assess-
ment functionality

Integration with 
social networks with 
video content 

Mobile app for influ-
encers with wallet to 
manage personal 
Token account

Identification 
of brand/logo/object/
phrase on video to 
analyze the impact 
of ads on all chan-
nels connected to the 
platform

Regular International 
campaigns for 
advertisers

RISKS

There are several main risks for contributors which need to be disclosed:

1. Technological. Because the economics of the project are based on stable operations and the effective-
ness of AI video recognition, technological risk had previously been a major factor. Currently, the risk is
extremely low, there are many frameworks which could be used for development of standard elements
of the platform.

Status: VERY LOW — in Paragraph 8 proof-of-concept is described.

2. Market.  Advertisers will not be ready to use influencers as native channels to deliver information.

Status: VERY LOW — audience migration to influencers and advertisers is well-documented. New deliv-
ery channels could appear but for now there is an organic way to harness influencers’ potential. Please
review Paragraph “Market overview”.

55



3. Legal. Systematic risk could be applied to wide range of players who work with cryptocurrencies and
Tokens. We consider the possibility of internal failures only.

Status: LOW — we will use a high-ranking International Law Firm to cover all possible issues and be
able to react quickly and properly on potential legal changes and adjustments. For now we are in the
middle of a tender procedure.

4. Security.  Regarding internal failures of security, there are some procedures applied: DDoS attack pre-
vention, audited smart contracts, MultiSig wallets. If it is necessary we will consider the possibility of
running AdHive internal operational procedures on top of other smart contract platforms.

Status: AVERAGE — we are attracting security professionals from the crypto industry and are prioritiz-
ing this division.

5. Business.  Risk of failure of the business development and scaling.

Status: LOW — two of the co-founders are former senior managers at Groupon with successful trac-
tion — the company created  huge experience of geographic and business growth in different categories
and industries. The business model B2B2C is very connected to the AdHive business model where we
will need to balance supply and demand — both B to increase audience of C — customers.

After the crowdsale, we will recruit business advisors from leading Ad-Tech companies with international scaling 
experience. 

COMPETITORS10

GOOGLE VIDEO ADVERTISING

Applicable to the advertisers

AdHive and Google are complementary services and competitors at the same time. Google (with video pre-rolls) 
provides an opportunity to deliver commercials to spectators similar to TV ad breaks. Such commercials are not 
related to the content, as there is almost no engagement of the audience. The price of such placement is based on 
number of views and additionally depends on current demand from other advertisers, and would not be less than 
the cost of a campaign on AdHive. Nevertheless, demand could affect the pricing on AdHive. The cost of placement 
with influencers is more inert, stable and predictable, and more sensitive to ad tasks than to demand. Google might 
be the better option for the promotion of difficult products or something people do not want to be connected with, 
but for the promotion of simple, attractive, or common products and services, AdHive will perform better. 

Google may be more convenient and familiar, and in some cases it may be better to use both AdHive and Google, 
but AdHive will ultimately be easier as it removes the necessity of actually producing commercials, and is more 
cost-effective since  there will be a much higher engagement rate. In addition, it will be transparent, with smart con-
tracts. And that is not even mentioning the curiosity factor — people will generate a lot of new unique content. We 
will provide a high level of comfort and confidentiality through native video ad placement with influencers.

56



Applicable to the influencers

By giving Google the right to show pre-rolls before videos, influencers can get an average of $0,7 per 1000 views 
of video, but influencers can earn up to $4 (6 times) from AdHive for native ads which is much more engaging for 
the audience. Plus, influencers can avoid irritating viewers with pre-rolls and get feedback and knowledge from the 
AdHive community on how to improve video quality and video ad placement. AdHive requires more involvement 
from influencers and most likely increases the time for video creation but the reward is significant. 

PLATFORMS FOR NATIVE AD PLACEMENT

AGENCIES

INFLUENCERS MARKETPLACE

COMPETITOR COMPARISON MATRIX

Media platforms for native ad placement like Ninja Outreach, BlogMint, BrandBacker and others mainly work with 
photo and text ad formats. In addition, they are partners, like AdEx, rather than competitors because they have not 
automated verification of video.

There are many agencies professionally engaged in advertising with YouTube influencers. The main difference be-
tween agencies and AdHive is the ability of Adhive.tv, thanks to AI, to work with a group of small influencers, which 
will provide more accurate targeting and a better price per contact. Agencies will continue their business, usually 
conducted by PR departments, with top-level influencers. For advertisers, AdHive will transfer native video cam-
paigns with influencers from manual craftwork to an automated tool for media placement. 

Agencies work mainly with top-level influencers that have at least 200,000 subscribers, but marketplaces are ready 
to work with everyone. However, all marketplaces operate in a very similar way: the advertiser can either create 
an advertising campaign, under which influencers can make their proposals, or they can find an influencer inde-
pendently for various parameters: subscribers, views, likes etc. It is hard to imagine that placement in a such way 
could be done on more than a dozen channels — it is far too much manual work. AdHive can easily place adver-
tisements on 10 or on 10000 channels with the same involvement and manual work on the part of the advertiser.

In terms of AdHive’s competitors, our team created the folowing comparison matrix with necessary information 
about our competitors’ key features. 

Project

Feature

Primarily manual 
targeting mecha-
nics

Targeting based on 
the Brave browser 
data 

AI-powered 
precise targeting 
mechanics

Marketplaces Basic Attention Token AdHive

Primarily manual 
targeting mecha-
nics

Marketing Agencies

Precise Audience 
Targeting

57



Cost-effective for 
digital ad place-
ment
Blockchain based 
transactions (less 
than 1%)

Service is availa-
ble for any type of 
business and any 
budgets

BAT only works 
with digital ad for-
mats like pre-rolls, 
banners, etc.

BAT reachable au-
dience is currently 
restricted by the 
number of Brave 
browser users

Available due to 
the use of Smart 
Contract techno-
logy

BAT works with 
verified publishers 
only

Cost-effective due 
to the high level of 
automation
Blockchain based 
transactions (less 
than 1%)

Service is availa-
ble for any type of 
business and any 
budgets

AI module allows 
AdHive to work 
with any size of 
influencers

Full automation, 
excludes any 
personal interven-
tion in all of the 
processes

Formalized and 
structured templa-
te, allows adver-
tiser to create a 
Smart Contract 
in a couple of 
minutes

AI and community 
powered quality 
control combined 
with Smart Con-
tract technology

Huge commissions 
up to 60%
Transaction fees 
up to 4%

High commissions 
and fees make 
agencies unavaila-
ble for small busi-
nesses

Agencies work 
mainly with top-le-
vel influencers that 
have at least 200k 
subscribers

Manual ad place-
ment process 
makes massive 
ad campaigns  
unavailable 

The need to con-
sistently negotiate 
and enter into 
numerous legal 
agreements

Subjective task 
performance 
assessment is not 
regulated by any 
external supervi-
sion

Huge commissions 
up to 60%
Transaction fees 
up to 4%

Marketplaces are 
mostly unavailable 
for small busines-
ses due to high 
fees and minimum 
budget require-
ments 

Marketplaces are 
ready to work with 
everyone, but ma-
nual work makes 
them unavailable 
for small influen-
cers

Manual ad place-
ment process 
makes massive 
ad campaigns 
unavailable

The need to con-
sistently negotiate 
and enter into 
numerous legal 
agreements

Subjective task 
performance 
assessment is not 
regulated by any 
external supervi-
sion

Cost-
effectiveness

Availability for 
small businesses

Availability for 
micro-influencers

Availability of 
massive ad 
placement 

Low transacti-
on costs (low 
communication 
barriers between 
market partici-
pants)

Anti-fraud 
protection

Real-time “attenti-
on” metrics

AdHive provides 
users with ac-
cess to real-time 
analytical data at 
all stages of the 
advertising cam-
paign

Analytical report 
after campaigns’ 
end

Analytical report 
after campaigns’ 
end

Accessible tools 
and metrics

58



Fully automated ad 
placement process

Not available

Scaling potential 
restricted due to 
dependence on 
Brave browser 
users number

Fully automated ad 
placement process

AI module is used 
for object, text and 
voice recognition 
in order to control 
quality of ad task 
performance

High potential for 
scaling

Mainly manual 
work

Not available

Scaling is unavaila-
ble for this type of 
service

Mainly manual 
work

Not available

Scaling is unavaila-
ble for this type of 
service

Campaign 
Automation

AI Involvement

Scaling potential

COMPETITOR COMPARISON MATRIX

Project

Feature

AI-powered 
precise targeting 
mechanics

Automated targe-
ting service

AI-powered 
precise targeting 
mechanics

SocialMedia.Market indaHash AdHive

Automated targe-
ting service

Efir.io 
(former qaazqaaz)

Precise Audience 
Targeting

Cost-effective 
Blockchain based 
transactions (less 
than 1%)

Cost-effective due 
to the high level of 
automation
Blockchain based 
transactions (less 
than 1%)

Cost-effective 
Blockchain based 
transactions (less 
than 1%)

Cost-effective 
Blockchain based 
transactions (less 
than 1%)

Cost-
effectiveness

Available for small 
companies

Service is availa-
ble for any type of 
business and any 
budgets

Available for small 
companies

Available for small 
companies

Availability for 
small businesses

Available for mi-
cro-influencers

AI module allows 
AdHive to work 
with any size of 
influencers

Currently works 
mainly with in-
fluencers that have 
100k+ subscribers

Available for mi-
cro-influencers

Availability for 
micro-influencers

59



Availability of mass 
campaigns is limi-
ted due to incom-
plete automation

Smart contract 
templates are 
available

Smart Contract 
only. No quality 
control system

Not available

Payment process 
automation only

Medium scaling 
potential

No information

Full automation, 
excluded any 
personal interven-
tion in all of the 
processes

Full automation, 
excluded any 
personal interven-
tion in all of the 
processes

AI and community 
powered quality 
control combined 
with Smart Con-
tract technology

Fully automated ad 
placement process

AI module is used 
for object, text and 
voice recognition 
in order to control 
quality of ad task 
performance

High scaling po-
tential

AdHive provides 
users with ac-
cess to real-time 
analytical data at 
all stages of the 
advertising cam-
paign

Availability of mass 
campaigns is limi-
ted due to incom-
plete automation

Smart contract 
templates are 
available

Expert communi-
ties are used for 
quality control + 
Smart Contract 

Views counting is 
automated — ex-
ternal services

Not available

Medium scaling 
potential

Available

Availability of mass 
campaigns is limi-
ted due to incom-
plete automation

Smart contract 
templates are 
available

Platform users par-
ticipate in dispute 
resolution + Smart 
Contract

All processes 
are automated, 
but there is no 
automatic quality 
control system

AI module used 
only for data ana-
lysis

Medium scaling 
potential

Available

Availability of 
massive ad 
placement 

Low transacti-
on costs (low 
communication 
barriers between 
market partici-
pants)

Anti-fraud 
protection

Campaign 
Automation

AI Involvement

Scaling potential

Accessible tools 
and metrics

Among all of the potential competitors, AdHive platform is the most attractive start up due to high level of 
automation and strong technical and innovation background.

60



1. Worldwide Ad Spending: eMarketer’s Updated Estimates and Forecast for 2016–2021 (eMarketer, 2017).

2. MAGNA Advertising Forecasts: Spring Update (Magna, 2017).

3. Carat Ad Spend report (Carat, 2016).

4. MAGNA Global Advertising Forecast (Magna, 2016).

5. Worldwide Digital Video Viewers: eMarketer’s Estimates for 2016-2020 (eMarketer, 2017).

6. IAB Video Ad Spend Study (IAB, 2017).

7. HubSpot Marketing Statistics (HubSpot, 2016).

8. The Impact of Video Marketing (Aberdeen Group, 2015).

9. The State of Blocked Web: 2017 Global AdBlock Report (PageFair, 2017).

10. Display Advertising Clickthrough rates (SmartInsights, 2017).

11. NAI: Native Advertising Definition.

12. The Global Native Advertising Expansion (AdYouLike, 2016).

13. The future of mobile advertising is native (Facebook Audience Network, IHS, 2016).

14. Native Advertising Trends 2017 (NAI, Fipp, 2017).

15. The State of Influencer Marketing 2017 (Linqia, 2016).

16. The 2017 state of the creator economy study (IZEA, 2017).

17. Sales Effect Study: WhiteWave Foods (Nielsen Catalina Solutions, TapInfluence, 2016).

LIST OF REFERENCES

APPENDIX #1. 
TECHNOLOGICAL SOLUTIONS

11

12

1. SCORCH.AI SOLUTIONS

Scorch.ai develops ready-to-implement machine vision and speech recognition solutions for different industries and 
applications:

• SDK for machine vision/Speech recognition: to choose algorithms and neural networks for specific prob-
lems and devices.

• Computation framework: to connect different algorithms, internal modules, raw data, train tools, different
OS through business process which is required for video and speech recognition.

• Train tool: to train an AI system to recognize what a business needs, includes web-interface, high degree
of automation, provides cost optimization for searching data sets.

61

http://scorch.ai/


SDK FOR MACHINE VISION — VIDEO AND SOUND RECOGNITION

COMPUTATION FRAMEWORK

http://scorch.ai/Technology/machine-vision/

http://scorch.ai/Technology/computation-framework/

SDK enables analysis of video content for visual recognition of objects, backgrounds, actions and emotions in var-
ious combinations. This module can recognize elements and actions, send them to the next unit or save them as a 
file, and based on that, any device or ecosystem can decide what to do next.

SDK enables combining different computer-vision algorithms with a recognition module for specific goals according 
to the requirements in accuracy and performance, for example:

The structure of artificial intelligence systems should be very different depending on the tasks that should be solved. 
To simplify the creation of complex AI systems for prediction and classification, the Scorch Computation Framework 
was developed.

The framework performs two key functions:

The SDK allows you to recognize chunks of speech and to translate speech into text with accuracy depending on 
the presence of words from the sample. If any words are missing, the SDK will make a hypothesis. The process 
consists of 3 steps: segmentation with neural networks; contour analysis using segmentation data; approxima-
tion-creation polygons to optimize transfer size.

• To find out if there is an object on the frame;
• To localize an object;
• To recognise and segment (to cut) an object.

1. Combination and integration which makes it possible to combine various machine learning modules.

2. Integration of input and output internal data with external data — video, sound, data from motion sen-

sors, radar. For analysis it can use neural networks, contour analysis, various mathematical filters and

decompositions (for example, sound can be decomposed into Fourier transforms), Machine Learning

classifiers (probabilistic, vector and others).

62

http://scorch.ai/Technology/machine-vision/
http://scorch.ai/Technology/computation-framework/


Layer 1

Layer 2

Layer 3

Moreover, the Computation Framework provides additional functionality for working with memory and various con-
figuration tools, such as sum of weights configuration modules from different units. This technology can be used for 
different purposes such as defining layers and data flows, identification of data sources, dividing layers into units, 
combining neural networks, etc.

Output 2

Output 2

Computation Unit 5

Computation Unit 2 Computation Unit 3

Output 1

XML HTTP FILE

Output 1

Computation Unit 4

Computation Unit 1

Video Audio Text

Summ module

Σ

Output 3

Output 3

TEXT

TRAINTOOL

http://scorch.ai/Technology/training-tool/

Traintool is an instrument for fast arrangement of datasets for ML modules. Traintool as a part of Scorch platform, it 
should take 2-3 times less for teaching modules to objects, action and sound recognition.

63

http://scorch.ai/Technology/training-tool/


Traintool is an instrument for fast arrangement of datasets for ML modules. Traintool as a part of Scorch platform, it 
should take 2-3 times less for teaching modules to objects, action and sound recognition.

Traintool advantages:

• Provide high level of independence from recognition services provider — teach on your own;
• Create additional data sets from input data;
• Pull data automatically from the Internet by the URL;
• Optimised and convenient development;
• Exchange skills with other modules via cloud;
• Train Neural Networks for Machine vision;
• Train Neural Networks for Speech recognition;
• Train classifiers for Computation Framework;
• Check training results and statistics.

64



2. WEBVANE FRAMEWORK

http://webvane.org/WebVaneFramework/

WebVane Framework — web application development technology — will be used to develop AdHive web 
services.

WebVane Framework is used for creating business apps with a web-based interface. WebVane significantly 
accelerates development of basic administration functions, business functions and methods, as well as 
quickly changes the settings to meet new requirements. Web-based interface can be built faster for existing 
systems using their own data. 

65

http://webvane.org/WebVaneFramework/


13 APPENDIX #2. 
MATH MODELS AND TOKEN MECHANICS

AdHive: the rewards schemes
Version 0.2

Serguei Popov

September 1, 2017

Description of the system. There are advertisers, bloggers, and users. The
advertisers pay bloggers for the (indirect) advertising; the users validate the work
of the bloggers. Additionally, the advertisers may conduct research within the
users’ community, asking them to fill some questionnaires. In the following, we
describe how the system works.

• An advertiser deposits an amount of funds (possibly but no necessarily in
ADH tokens), which serves to pay the bloggers and the users. In fact, it
may be a good idea to separate bloggers’ reward fund from the users’ reward
fund already in the beginning, in order not to create an incentive for users
to undervaluate bloggers (and therefore increase the own rewards).

• A blogger, who is willing to take a part of that reward, proceeds in the
following way:

– he makes a small security deposit (this is for spam prevention), which
he will get back in case the user community decides that his work was
not trash;

– then, he produces content (say, a video with indirect promotion of the
advertiser’s brand);

– he then receives a reward based on the community evaluations, and the
number of views.

• A user produces evaluations of the bloggers’ efforts in the following way:

– After seeing the content produces by the blogger, the user rates it on the
scale ranging from 0 to 100, in accordance e.g. to the following question:

1



How likely is this video to improve your perception of the brand,
under the hypothesis that you were neutral to it before?

– The user then receives a reward based on the closeness of his evaluation
to the median of the weighted1 dataset of all evaluations.

Next, we describe our proposal in detail. For the sake of notational cleanness,
in the following we assume that the users’ evaluation scores rather range from 0
to 1 (just divide the “previous” evaluation score by 100).

Some notations. There are N users, let b
(k)
i be the balance of the ith user at

block k. Let B be the total number of tokens that exist; note that B =
∑

i b
(k)
i

for all k. There are M bloggers that take on the task proposed by the advertiser.
Let vij ∈ [0, 1] ∪ {℘} be the evaluation given by the ith user to the jth blogger,
i = 1, . . . , N , j = 1, . . . ,M . We set vij = ℘ when the ith user did not evaluate
the jth blogger; here, ℘ is just a special symbol2 meant to indicate the absence of
evaluation.

We assume that the evaluation starts at block n0 + 1 and ends at block n0 + k0
(that is, it lasts k0 blocks). We then define the average balance b̄i of the ith user
during the evaluation period by

b̄i =
b
(n0+1)
i + · · ·+ b

(n0+k0)
i

k0
.

Notice that it also holds that B =
∑

i b̄i.
Next, fix j ∈ {1, . . . ,M} and consider the weighted dataset (v1j, . . . , vNj) with

the corresponding weights

wij =

{
b̄i, if vij 6= ℘,
0, if vij = ℘

for i = 1, . . . , N (that is, we effectively exclude the users who did not evaluate the
jth blogger from that dataset). Let mj be the 5%-trimmed mean

3 of the above

1by the average balances, see below
2one may as well assume, for example, that ℘ = −1
3that is, we discard 5% of top and 5% of bottom evaluations (with respect to their weight),

and then take the weighted mean of the rest

2



0 1

1

Figure 1: A few possible bloggers’ reward functions

weighted dataset, and Ij be its interquartile range
4. Let us define also

θj = B
−1

N∑
i=1

wij

to be the proportion of tokens that took part in the evaluation of the jth blogger.

Estimating the number of views in 30 days. The following question is of
practical importance: given the number of views of a particular content during the
first week, estimate the number of views of that content during a month. Here,
one is tempted to consider the distribution of these views within the seven days (or
maybe simply the number of clicks per day) and then perform a statistical analysis
of all that data in order to achieve a finer prediction. The author is not unfamiliar
with statistical methods that can be used for such a task, but nevertheless suggests
the following simpler scheme. Use a simple linear regression (the usual least-square
or maybe rather some robust variant such as e.g. the Theil-Sen estimator [1]) on
the set of the last (say) 25 videos of the blogger, with the variables “the number of
views in seven days” and “the number of views in a month”. This is because if we
try to do a finer analysis, this would also open more possibilities for manipulations
e.g. of the following kind: the blogger artificially inflates the number of views on
the seventh day, to make the system “think” that the view counts on subsequent
days would not decrease too quickly.

Bloggers’ rewards. Consider a nondecreasing function f : [0, 1]→ [0, 1], which
we call the bloggers’ reward function (see Figure 1). Let also sj be the number of
views that the jth blogger’s content received (or, possibly, the projected number

4i.e., Ij = Q
(j)
3 −Q

(j)
1 where Q1 and Q3 are the quartiles of the above weighted dataset

3



of views obtained by the simple linear regression estimate above). Fix some k1
(e.g., k1 = 10), and consider the weighted (by the participation’s proportions)
average evaluation of the blogger’s work taking into account also the previous k1
evaluations:

Mj =
θjmj + θ

(−1)
j m

(−1)
j + · · ·+ θ

(−k1)
j m

(−k1)
j

θj + θ
(−1)
j + · · ·+ θ

(−k1)
j

,

where θ
(−1)
j , . . . , θ

(−k1)
j and m

(−1)
j , . . . ,m

(−k1)
j are the corresponding quantities ob-

tained during the last k1 evaluations of the jth blogger. Then, his reward Rj will be
proportional to that number of views and the reward function of the quantity Mj,
i.e.,

Rj ∼ sjf(Mj). (1)

We prefer to use Mj rather than mj to make the results more “predictable” for
the blogger.

Quality of evaluation. We propose the following way to measure the quality γj
of the jth evaluation:

γj = min
( Ij√θj
ε+ 4mj(1−mj)

, C
)
, (2)

where C and ε are fixed constants; one may take e.g. C = 1 and ε = 0.03. To
explain the reasoning behind (2), first observe that the situation when (almost) all
users make (almost) exactly the same evaluation usually indicates the existence of
some conspiracy between them; in normal circumstances the evaluations are natu-
rally spread. This explains the factor Ij in the numerator. It is also reasonable to
say that a better evaluation has to have more participants, although that depen-
dence need not be linear (hence the factor

√
θj in the numerator). Observe that

it is not usually possible to organize a conspiracy in order to increase Ij, since this
would require that many users must voluntarily make excessively good and/or ex-
cessively bad evaluations, thus strongly decreasing their own rewards. Next, if mj
is close to 0 or 1, then the spread of evaluations has to be naturally smaller; we
introduce the term 4mj(1−mj) to compensate this. The (small) number ε > 0 is
added to that term to deal with (highly improbable but still possible) “boundary”
situations, when at least (weighted) half of the users gave the score 0 (or at least
half of the users gave the score 1) to the jth blogger. The constant C is an upper
limit, introduced to prevent the evaluation’s quality from varying too much.

4



0

Figure 2: Examples of possible users’ reward functions

Users’ rewards. We propose that the reward R̃kj of the kth user in the jth
evaluation should be proportional to wkj (i.e., to b̄k in the case when the user has
effectively taken part in the evaluation), also to γj, and the users’ reward function g
of the distance from the user’s evaluation to the median mj, normalized by the
interquartile range Ij:

R̃kj ∼ wkjγjg
(mj − vkj

Ij

)
. (3)

Examples of possible users’ reward functions can be seen on Figure 2.

References

[1] Theil-Sen estimator: en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Theil-Sen_estimator

5


	AdHive_Whitepaper_EN
	adhive0_2



